Box Privacy Policy
Please select your region from the list below to view the Privacy Policy.
►
United States - English
Your privacy is important to Box. This privacy policy (“Policy”) applies to the Box Web sites and services and tells you how personal information is collected, used, disclosed, and protected by Box. If you use the Box site and services as part of an entity or organization that has Enterprise service with Box (like your employer or a university), the individual terms of that organization’s contract for Enterprise service may restrict our collection or use of your personal information more than what is described in this Policy.  This statement includes Box’s European Union and Swiss Safe Harbor Privacy Statements and the Website Privacy Statements.
Changes to This Policy
We may change this Policy from time to time. If we make any changes to this Policy, we will change the “last updated” date above. If there are material changes to this Policy, we will notify you more directly. We encourage you to check this Policy whenever you use our Web sites and services to understand how your personal information is used.
Information Collected
We collect information from you in various ways when you use our Web sites and services. We may also supplement this information with information from other companies. We collect two general types of information, namely personal information and aggregate data. As used in this Policy, the term “personal information” means information that specifically identifies an individual (such as a name and email address), and demographic and other information when directly linked to information that can identify an individual.
Our definition of personal information does not include “aggregate” data. Aggregate data is information we collect about a group or category of services or users from which individual user identities have been removed. In other words, no personal information is included in aggregate data. Aggregate data helps us understand trends in our users’ needs so that we can better consider new features or otherwise tailor our services. This Policy in no way restricts or limits our collection and use of aggregate data, and we may share aggregate data about our users with third parties for various purposes, including to help us better understand our customer needs and improve our services and for advertising and marketing purposes.
The following are the specific types of information we collect from you.
Information You Give Us. We collect information you give us on our Web site and when you register for and use our services. Examples include the following:
Registration and Profile Information. When you register to use our services or update your profile, we may collect various kinds of information about you including, your name and email address; your title, company and other profile information you provide; demographic information; and information you upload like photos, files, and documents.
Contact Information. We collect the email addresses you provide for contacts you enter or upload into your private contacts page. When you choose to collaborate or share files with others, we also collect email addresses you provide to email invitations to those individuals on your behalf.
Payment Information. If you choose to use a paid Box account or service, our payment processing vendor collects your credit card information and billing address.
Submissions and Customer Service. From time to time we may use surveys, contests or sweepstakes requesting personal or demographic information and customer feedback.
Automatically Collected Information. We automatically receive certain types of information when you interact with our Web pages, services and communications. For example, it is standard for your Web browser to automatically send information to every Web site you visit, including ours. That information includes your computer’s IP address, access times, your browser type and language, and referring Web site addresses. We may also collect information about the type of operating system you use, your account activity, and files and pages accessed or used by you.
Cookies and Web Beacons. We may also use certain kinds of technology such as cookies and Web beacons to collect information. Among other things, the use of cookies and Web beacons enables us to improve our Web sites and emails by seeing which areas and features are most popular, to count the number of computers accessing our Web site, to personalize and improve your experience, to record your preferences, and to allow you to visit our Web site without re-entering your member ID and/or password. A cookie is a small amount of data which is sent to your browser from a Web site’s computers and stored on your computer’s hard drive. Most browsers automatically accept cookies as the default setting. You can modify your browser setting to reject our cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie by editing your browser options. However, if a browser is set not to accept cookies or if a user rejects a cookie, some portions of the Web site and services may not function properly. For example, you may not be able to sign in and access certain Web page features or services. A Web beacon is an electronic image, also called a "gif," that may be used on our Web pages to deliver cookies, count visits and compile statistics on usage and campaign effectiveness or in our emails to tell if an email has been opened and acted upon.
Use of Personal Information.
In general, we use your personal information to process your requests or transactions, to provide you with information or services you request, to inform you about other information, events, promotions, products or services we think will be of interest to you, to facilitate your use of, and our administration and operation of, the Web site and services and to otherwise serve you and our users. For example, we may use your personal information:
to request feedback and to enable us to develop, customize and improve the Web site and our publications, products and services;
to conduct marketing analysis, to send you surveys or newsletters, to contact you about services, products, activities, special events or offers from Box or our partners and for other marketing, informational, product development and promotional purposes;
to send you a welcoming email and to contact you about your use of the Web site and services; to respond to your emails, submissions, comments, requests or complaints; to perform after-sales services; to anticipate and resolve problems with our service; to respond to customer support inquiries, for assistance with our product and service development; and to inform you of updates to products and services from Box that better meet your needs;
to store contacts you enter or upload into your contacts list for your private use and viewing;
to send emails to users you invite (and contacts you invite to become users) to collaborate and access your files;
to enable you to communicate, collaborate, and share files with users you designate;
to contact you if you win a contest; and
for other purposes about which we notify you.
Box may store and process personal information in the United States and other countries. Box adheres to the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Safe Harbor privacy principles regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from the European Union, and the U.S. Department of Commerce’s U.S. Swiss Safe Harbor privacy principles regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from Switzerland. Box’s Safe Harbor certifications can be found at
http://web.ita.doc.gov/safeharbor/shlist.nsf/webPages/safe+harbor+list
. For more information about the Safe Harbor Principles, please visit the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Website at
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
Sharing of Personal Information.
Box reserves the right to share aggregated demographic information about our customers, sales, and traffic to our partners and advertisers. We will not give, sell, rent, share, or trade any of your personal information or any data that you store using our services to any third party except as outlined in this Policy or with your consent. We may disclose information to a third party to (a) comply with laws or respond to lawful requests and legal process, (b) to protect Box, agents, customers, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies and terms of use or (c) in the good faith belief that disclosure is needed to respond to an emergency, or protect the personal safety of any person.
If you are an individual Box registered user, and the domain of the primary email address associated with your Box account is owned by your employer and that email address was assigned to you as an employee of that organization, and that organization wishes to establishes a Box corporate account and add you to it, then certain information concerning past use of your individual account may become accessible to that organization’s administrator including your email address.
Box includes collaboration features that by their nature support sharing with users you choose. Those users can see your name, email address, photo and information from your Profile page, and any files you choose to share; and they can post comments and email you. Collaborators you invite as editors can also edit your shared files, upload documents and photos to your shared files, share those documents outside of Box, and give other users rights to view your shared files.
Box provides you with opportunities to connect with third party applications or services, such as through our Open Box page or Box application partner ecosystem. If you choose to use any such third party applications or services, we may facilitate sharing of your information including your Box username and documents you choose to use with those applications and services and such third parties may contact you directly as necessary. Your use of such applications and services is not governed by Box’s terms or privacy policy. Box does not control the applications or services of those third parties or how they use your information and documents. Be sure to review the terms and the privacy policies of those third parties before using their applications or services.
We may share personal information in connection with an acquisition, merger, or sale of all or a substantial portion of our business, with or to another company. In any such event, you will receive notice if your data is transferred and becomes subject to a substantially different privacy policy.
Network and Information Security.
Box takes reasonable steps to protect information we collect from you to prevent loss, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction. In addition, highly confidential personal information such as credit card number and password that we request from you on our Web site is protected with encryption, such as Secured Socket Layer (SSL) protocol, during transmission over the Internet.
The servers on which information is stored are kept in a controlled environment with limited access. While we take reasonable efforts to guard personal information we knowingly collect directly from you, no security system is impenetrable. In addition, we cannot guarantee that any passively-collected personal information you choose to include in documents you store on our systems are maintained at adequate levels of protection to meet specific needs or obligations you may have relating to that information.
Your account information and access to our service is accessible only through the use of an individual user ID and password. To protect the confidentiality of personal information, you must keep your password confidential and not disclose it to any other person. Please advise us immediately if you believe your password has been misused. In addition, always logout and close your browser when you finish your session. Please note that we will never ask you to disclose your password in an unsolicited phone call or email.
Updating and Accessing Personal Information.
If your personal information changes in any way, we invite you to correct or update your information as soon as possible. You can make updates to your profile information by logging into your account on Box at any time. You can also request changes or access to your information by emailing
support@box.com
.
Choice/Opt-Out.
Box may send you communications or data regarding our Web sites and services, including but not limited to (i) notices about your use of our Web sites and services, including any notices concerning violations of use, (ii) updates, and (iii) promotional information and materials regarding our products and services. You may opt-out of receiving promotional emails from Box by following the opt-out instructions provided in those emails. You may also opt-out of receiving promotional emails and other promotional communications from us at any time by emailing
support@box.com
with your specific request. Opt-out requests will not apply to transactional service messages, such as security alerts and notices about your current account and services.
Enforcement
If you have any questions about this Policy, you should first contact us at
support@box.com
.  If you do not receive a response or your inquiry has not been satisfactorily addressed, you should then contact TRUSTe at
http://www.truste.org/consumers/watchdog_complaint.php
. TRUSTe will serve as a liaison with Box to resolve your concerns.
Contacting Us.
Any questions about this Policy should be addressed to
support@box.com
.
►
日本 - 日本語
Box.com (UK) Ltd（以下、「
Box
」または「弊社
」といいます）は、ユーザーのプライバシ権を尊重するとともに、お客様に関して収集された情報を法律とベストプラクティスの両方に基づいて保護し、取り扱うことの重要性を認識しています。
このオンラインおよびモバイルにおける個人情報の保護およびクッキーに関する方針、弊社のサ
ービス利用規約
および下記で参照される一切の文書（以下、これらを「
この個人情報保護方針
」と総称します）では、お客様（以下、「
お客様
」といいます）に対し、Box
						がお客様の情報（個人データおよび機微な個人情報を含みます）をどのように収集、使用、保存および開示するか、ならびにお客様がご自身の情報に関して取り得る特定の選択肢について説明しています。
この個人情報保護方針は、www.Box.com における弊社のオンラインもしくはモバイル向けウェブサイト（以下、「
当サイト
」といいます）、製品、サービスもしくはアプリケーション（以下、「
Box
サービス
」と総称します）をお客様が利用される際、またはその他お客様が弊社と関わりを持たれる際に弊社が収集する情報に適用されます。
お客様の個人データやその取り扱い方法に関する弊社の姿勢や取り組みをご理解頂くため、以下の内容をよくお読みください。
サービスのすべての面において常に Box がデータ管理者となるわけではないことにご留意ください。Box
						サービスの一部としてアップロードまたは処理される個人データには、最終的なデータ管理者によってアップロードされるものもあります。その例としては、データ管理者を代理する従業員または代理人などがあります。また、その対象となるものには、Box
						サービスの利用の際に共有またはコラボレートされたファイルまたは文書に含まれる個人データなどがあります。このような状況においては、Box が末端のデータ管理者を代理するデータ処理業者となり、Box サービスは、当該データ管理者（お客様の雇用主や大学など（以下、「
ビジネスユーザー
」といいます））を代理して展開されます。当該データ管理者は、別途弊社と業務契約を締結しており、その契約のもとでは、弊社が、当該データ管理者を代理して、当該データ管理者が責任を負う個人データの保全と保護のために組織的かつ技術的な方法を用いることになります。
そのため、お客様がビジネスユーザーである場合には、その組織における Box
						サービスに関する契約の条件によっては、弊社によるお客様の情報の収集および使用について、この個人情報保護方針に規定された制限よりも強い制限を受ける場合があります。このような場合もあるため、この個人情報保護方針と合わせて、上記の契約の条件にも目を通してください。
本方針の変更
弊社は、この個人情報保護方針を適宜変更する場合があります。弊社は、何らかの変更を加えた場合には、この個人情報保護方針の上部の「最終更新」日を更新します。また、必要に応じて、お客様へ追加の通知（弊社のホームページへの記載またはお客様へのEメール通知など）を行う場合があります。この個人情報保護方針に重大な変更がある場合、弊社は、E
						メールによる方法で直接お客様に通知します。そのため、弊社の情報に対する取り組みやお客様におけるご自身の個人情報の保護に役立つ方法について最新情報を得ることができるよう、Box サービスへのアクセスの都度、この個人情報保護方針を確認することをお勧めします。
この個人情報保護方針への変更に同意できず、お客様の情報にこの個人情報保護方針の改定版を適用したくない場合、お客様は、弊社におけるアカウントを無効化して
Box
サービスの利用を中止する必要があります。
この個人情報保護方針、またはお客様に関して弊社が保有する情報についてご不明な点がございましたら、下記の「
弊社へのお問い合わせ
」の規定に従って弊社までお問い合わせください。
収集される情報
弊社は、Box サービスの提供、当サイトの改善、弊社のサービスにおけるユーザーの操作性向上を可能にするため、様々な情報を収集します。例えば、お客様のインターネットサービスプロバイダ（以下、「
ISP
」といいます）の所在地を確認することにより、当サイトにおいて地域に合わせたカスタマイズを提供できるようになります（お問い合わせ先、言語および通貨の修正が可能になります）。弊社におけるお客様の情報の使用目的に関する詳細については、下記の「
情報の使用
」の項目 をご覧ください。
弊社は、以下の情報（個人データや機微な個人情報などが含まれます）を収集します。
お客様が弊社に提供する情報
弊社は、お客様が当サイトの利用時または Box サービスの登録および利用時に弊社に直接提供した情報を収集します。これには、例えば以下のものが含まれます。
弊社は、お客様が次のことを行った際に、情報を収集します。Box におけるアカウントの登録、プロフィールやオンラインアカウントの作成や変更、Box
							サービスのアクセスや利用（ファイルやその他の情報についてのアップロード、ダウンロード、コラボレーションまたは共有などが含まれますが、これらに限定されません）、Box
							サービスの双方向機能への参加、アンケート、コンテスト、販促、懸賞、活動もしくはイベントへの参加、購入、求人への応募、カスタマーサポートの要請、第三者のソーシャルメディアサイトを通じた弊社との連絡、またはその他の方法による弊社との連絡。
弊社がお客様から直接収集する情報には、次の種類のものが含まれます。お客様の名前、ユーザー名、メールアドレス、住所、電話番号、お客様のデータ保存の個人設定に関する情報、従業員の名前、役職、取引情報（購入または加入したサービスや請求先住所を含みます）、および連絡先情報またはその他お客様が提供することを選択した情報。弊社は、お客様がBox
							サービスへアップロードまたは提供したファイルやその他の情報（以下、「
対象コンテンツ
」といいます）を保存することもあります。
お客様は、他者に関する情報（個人データを含みます）を提供する場合には、その者がお客様を自己の代理人として任命しているか、個人データの処理が行われることに同意しているか、および弊社の身元や個人データの処理が行われる目的（この個人情報保護方針に記載されているもの）をお客様がその者に伝えているかどうかを確認するものとします。
弊社が自動的に収集する情報
弊社は、お客様が Box サービスにアクセスするかまたはこれを利用した際に、お客様に関する情報を自動的に収集することがあります。これには、以下のものが含まれます。
利用情報：
弊社は、Box サービスに関連するユーザーアクティビティをモニタリングし、次に関する情報を収集することがあります。お客様が利用したアプリケーションおよび機能、お客様が閲覧したウェブサイト、Box
							サービスの利用中にお客様がアップロード、ダウンロード、共有またはアクセスしたファイルまたはフォルダのサイズおよび名前、お客様がアクセスした対象コンテンツ、ならびに Box サービスにおけるお客様の対象コンテンツのアクセスおよび利用に関連してとられた動作。
ログ情報：
弊社は、Box サービスへのアクセス時および利用時に、お客様に関する情報のログを取っています。これには、次のものが含まれます。お客様のインターネットプロトコル（以下、「
IP
」といいます）アドレス、アクセス時間、ブラウザの種類および言語、ISP、お客様が訪問したウェブページ、お客様が利用した対象コンテンツ、お客様が Box サービスへ移動する前に閲覧したウェブページの URL。
デバイス情報：
お客様がモバイルデバイスから Box
							サービスにアクセスした場合、弊社は、デバイスに関する情報を収集します。これには、次のものが含まれます。ハードウェアのモデル、オペレーティングシステムおよびそのバージョン、デバイスの固有識別コード、モバイルネットワーク情報（モバイルネットワークからの許可内容によります）またはプラットフォーム情報（特定のプラットフォームのタイプからの許可内容によります）。
クッキーおよびその他のトラッキング技術によって収集される情報：
弊社は、情報の収集および当サイトにおけるお客様と他のユーザーとの区別のために、クッキーやウェブビーコンなどの様々なトラッキング技術を用いています。これには、お客様のコンピュータまたはモバイルデバイスへのクッキーの保存が含まれる場合があります。この技術により、お客様による Box
							サービスの閲覧および利用の際に優れた操作性を提供することができるとともに、弊社における Box サービスの改善が可能となります。弊社におけるクッキーの使用態様やその他のトラッキング技術の詳細については、「
クッキー
」の項目 をご覧ください。
弊社が他の出所から収集する情報
弊社は、第三者からも情報を入手し、その情報と弊社において Box
						サービスで収集した情報とを統合することがあります。例えば、お客様が第三者のソーシャルメディアサービスを通じてオンラインアカウントの作成やログインを行った場合、その他このようなサービスにおける情報への弊社によるアクセスをお客様が許可した場合には、このような第三者のソーシャルメディアサービスにおける一定の情報に弊社がアクセスすることがあります。弊社が第三者のソーシャルメディアサービスにおいてこのような情報にアクセスする場合は、当該ソーシャルメディアサービスの定める認証手続に従って行います。
情報の使用
弊社は、お客様に関して収集した情報（個人データが含まれる場合があります）を、様々な目的に使用することがあります。これには、例えば以下のものが含まれます。
Box サービスの提供、運営、維持および改善を行うため
お客様が Box サービスにアクセスして利用できるようにするため。これには、対象コンテンツのアップロード、ダウンロード、コラボレーションおよび共有、ならびにお客様のための E メールの送信が含まれます。
技術的な通知、更新、セキュリティ警告、ならびにサポートおよび管理に関するメッセージをお客様に送信するため
お客様の希望するサービスおよび機能の提供および配信、取引の処理および履行、ならびにお客様への関連情報（注文確認および請求書など）の送付を行うため
お客様からのご意見、ご質問およびご要望への対応、ならびにカスタマーサービスおよびサポートの提供を行うため
お客様の同意がある場合または法律のもとで許される場合に、マーケティング目的でお客様にメッセージを送信するため。これには、サービス、機能、アンケート、ニュースレター、提案、販促、コンテンツおよびイベントを定期的にお客様へお知らせするためのものや、Box
							や弊社の選択したパートナ企業に関するその他のニュースや情報を提供するためのものが含まれます。弊社は、お客様の同意がある場合に限り、マーケティング目的のためにお客様の個人データを第三者と共有したり、お客様に販促資料を送付したりします。お客様の個人設定の変更方法、および販促資料（ニュースレター、マーケティング情報および
							E メール通知を含みます）の配信停止方法に関する詳細については、下記の「
お客様の選択肢
」の項目 をご覧ください。
コンテストや懸賞における応募の処理や賞品の送付を行うため
マーケティングまたは広告宣伝目的で、Box サービスに関連する動向、用法および活動のモニタリングや分析を行うため
詐欺的な取引、Box サービスへの不正サクセス、その他の不法な活動を調査および防止するため
Box サービスのカスタマイズや改善、お客様の興味や好みに合ったコンテンツ、機能および広告の提供、その他お客様における Box サービスの操作性のカスタマイズを行うため
お客様のニーズを把握してより良いサービスを提供することを目的として、弊社が第三者から受領する他の情報とリンクさせたり組み合わせたりするため
お客様が指定したユーザーとお客様が通信、コラボレーション、ファイル共有を行えるようにするため
その他の目的で弊社がお客様に通知するため
弊社におけるお客様の情報の保管場所
Box は、英国を拠点としていますが、弊社グループのアメリカ合衆国における関係会社である Box Inc. を通じ、個人情報やコンテンツの保存や処理をアメリカ合衆国やその他の国々において行うことがあります。お客様は、Box
						サービスのアクセスや利用、その他弊社への情報の提供を行うことにより、次のことに同意したことになります。アメリカ合衆国 （Box Inc.
						およびその代理人が弊社のために情報保存を行う国）およびその他の国や地域における情報の処理、ならびに同国地域への情報の転送。このような国や地域においては、個人情報保護に関する法律が、お客様の居住する国とは異なる場合があります。
この個人情報保護方針についてご不明な点がございましたら、まずは弊社まで E メール（
support@box.com
）にてご連絡ください。
情報の共有および開示
弊社は、この個人情報保護方針に記載のある場合または Box サービスに関連する場合を除き、お客様に関する個人情報および対象コンテンツを第三者と共有することはありません。弊社は、例えば以下のような場合に、お客様に関する個人情報を共有することがあります。
ベンダ、コンサルタントおよびその他のサービスプロバイダ：
弊社は、弊社のために業務を行う外部のベンダ、コンサルタントおよびその他のサービスプロバイダのうち、その業務を行うためにお客様の情報にアクセスする必要がある者との間で、お客様の情報を共有することがあります。
法人アカウント：
お客様が、Box の個人登録ユーザーであり、お客様の Box アカウントに関連付けられた主要なメールアドレスのドメインを雇用主が所有し、かつ当該メールアドレスが、当該組織の従業員としてお客様に割り当てられているときに、当該組織が Box
							法人アカウントを開設し、お客様をそのアカウントに追加することを希望した場合は、当該組織の管理者は、お客様の個人アカウントの過去の使用に関する特定の情報（メールアドレスなど）にアクセスできることがあります。
お客様の同意を条件とするもの：
弊社は、お客様の同意を条件として、お客様の情報を共有することがあります。お客様の同意があるには、お客様が Box
							サービスにおいてコラボレーション機能（その性質上、お客様の選択した第三者との共有をサポートするものです）の利用を選択した場合も含まれます。お客様の名前、メールアドレス、お客様のプロフィールおよびオンラインアカウントにおける情報（お客様の写真を含みます）、およびお客様が共有対象として選択した一切の対象コンテンツが、第三者と共有されます。当該第三者は、お客様による
							Box サービスのコラボレーション機能の利用に関連して、お客様と連絡を取ることができます（コメントの投稿やお客様への E メール送信など）。例えば、お客様が Box
							サービスのコラボレーション機能を利用し、第三者を「編集者」としてご自身とのコラボレーションへ招待すると、その第三者は、お客様の共有した対象コンテンツを修正したり、お客様の共有した対象コンテンツへ文書や写真をアップロードしたり、そのような対象コンテンツを Box
							サービス外で共有したり、お客様の共有した対象コンテンツの閲覧権限を他の第三者に付与したりすることができます。
第三者のアプリケーション：
Box は、Box OneCloud または Box
							アプリケーションパートナーエコシステムを介するなどの方法により、お客様に、第三者のアプリケーションやサービスに接続する機会を提供します。お客様が、当該第三者のアプリケーションまたはサービスを利用することを選択した場合、弊社は、お客様に関する情報（お客様のユーザー名、お客様がアプリケーションやサービスに関連して使用することを選択したあらゆる対象コンテンツなど）を共有し、当該第三者は、必要に応じて、お客様に直接連絡することができます。この個人情報保護方針は、このような第三者のアプリケーションやサービスには適用されません。また、弊社は、これら第三者によるお客様の情報や対象コンテンツの収集、使用および開示の態様について、責任を負いません。第三者のアプリケーションまたはサービスに接続するかまたはこれを使用する場合は、当該第三者における情報や個人情報保護に関する取り組みの詳細を知るため、事前に当該第三者の規約および個人情報保護方針を確認することをお勧めします。
法律の遵守：
弊社は、次のいずれかに該当する場合に、お客様の情報を第三者へ開示することがあります。（a）適用のある法律、規則、法的手続または政府の要求に従うために、開示の合理的必要性があると弊社が判断する場合。（b）弊社における契約、方針およびサービス利用規約を実施するため。（c）Box
							サービスの安全性や完全性を保護するため。（d）Box、弊社のお客様または公益を危害や不法な活動から保護するため。（e）個人の死亡もしくは重大な人身傷害の防止に協力するために弊社による情報開示が必要と Box が誠実に判断する緊急事態に対応するため。
事業の譲渡
：弊社は、以下のいずれかに該当する場合に、お客様の個人情報を第三者へ開示することがあります。
o 弊社が事業や資産の全部または大部分について売却、合併または買収を行う場合。この場合には、弊社は、このような事業や資産の売主候補、合併相手候補または買主候補に対し、お客様の個人データを開示することがあります。
o Box.com (UK) Ltd もしくは弊社の他のグループ会社（弊社の最終的な親会社である Box Inc. を含みます）、またはこれらの資産の実質的全部が第三者に買収された場合。この場合には、買収の対象となった会社が保有する個人データは、譲渡対象資産の一部となります。
集計データまたは匿名化データ：
弊社は、集計された情報または匿名化された情報を第三者と共有することがあります。これによって直接にお客様個人が特定されることはありません。
弊社のグループ：
弊社は、お客様の個人情報を弊社のグループ会社に開示することがあります。弊社のグループ会社とは、Box が支配し、Box により支配され、または Box と共通の支配下にある会社を意味します。
コラボレーション機能および共有機能
Box サービスでは、コラボレーション機能やその他の統合ツールを提供します。これにより、Box サービスを通じてお客様による対象コンテンツの共有が可能になります。Box
					サービスにおけるコラボレーション機能を利用することにより、お客様の選択した許可内容と設定に基づき、お客様がコラボレーションを希望する人々、または公衆との間で対象コンテンツの共有が可能になります。お客様は、ご自身のアカウントにより、ファイルやフォルダの設定をいつでも変更することができます。このようなコラボレーション機能および共有機能に関する詳細については、
success.box.com
に記載の情報を確認することをお勧めします。
セキュリティ
どのようなサービスであっても完全に安全というわけにはいきませんが、Box
						は、お客様に関する情報を喪失、盗用、不正使用、不正なアクセス、開示、改ざんおよび破棄から保護するために有用な合理的措置を講じています。例えば、弊社は、お客様の対象コンテンツが弊社のデータセンタに保存される際に、その対象コンテンツを暗号化します。さらに、Box
						サービス上でお客様に提供をお願いした機微な個人情報（クレジットカード番号、パスワードなど）は、インターネットでの送受信時に Secured Socket Layer（SSL）プロトコルなどの暗号化を用いて保護されます。
個人情報が保存されるサーバーは、アクセス制限のある管理された環境内に設置されます。弊社は、お客様から意図的に直接収集した個人情報を保護するために合理的な努力を行いますが、どのようなセキュリティシステムであっても、侵入される可能性があります。オープンでグローバルなコミュニケーション手段としてのインターネット固有の性質上、弊社は、情報が、インターネットを通じた送信中や弊社のシステムにおける保管中、またはその他弊社の管理下にある間において、他者（ハッカーなど）からの侵入に対し完全に安全であることを保証することはできません。また、弊社のシステムに保存する文書に含めることをお客様が選択した受動的に収集される個人情報について、弊社は、当該情報に関してお客様が有する場合のある必要性または義務を満たすレベルの保護が維持されることを保証できません。
お客様は、個人のユーザー ID
						とパスワードの使用を通じてのみ、ご自身のアカウント情報および弊社サービスにアクセスすることができます。個人情報の秘密性を保護するために、パスワードは秘密に保持し、誰にも開示してはなりません。パスワードが悪用されたと思われる場合は、直ちに弊社に報告してください。また、セッションの終了後は、必ずログアウトして、ブラウザを閉じてください。弊社が一方的に電話または
						E メールでお客様にパスワードの開示を求めることは一切ありません。
クッキーに関する方針
弊社は、情報の収集および Box サービスにおけるお客様と他のユーザーとの区別のために、クッキーやウェブビーコンなどの様々なトラッキング技術を用いています。これには、お客様のコンピュータまたはモバイルデバイスへのクッキーの保存が含まれる場合があります。この技術により、お客様による Box
						サービスの閲覧および利用の際に優れた操作性を提供することができるとともに、弊社における Box サービスの改善が可能となります。
クッキーの説明
クッキーは、お客様の同意に基づきお客様のコンピュータのブラウザまたはハードドライブに保存される小さなデータファイルです。クッキーには、お客様のハードドライブに転送される情報が含まれます。
ウェブビーコンの説明
ウェブビーコン（「トラッキングピクセル」としても知られているもの）は、「gif」とも呼ばれる電子画像です。ウェブビーコンを Box サービスや E メールで使用することで、弊社においてクッキーの配信、アクセス数の計測、利用状況やキャンペーンの有効性の把握、および E
						メールの開封の状況や反応の判断が可能になります。
これらの技術の弊社における使用態様
弊社は、次のことを目的として、クッキーとウェブビーコンを利用します。弊社において Box サービスおよびお客様の操作性の改善や、お客様の操作性と個人設定のカスタマイズに役立てること、お客様がメンバー ID やパスワードを再入力することなく Box
						サービスへアクセスし、利用できるようにすること、およびアクセス数を計測すること。
弊社が使用するクッキーの種類
以下の記載は、当サイトにおけるクッキーの種類を概略するとともに、このようなクッキーによって何が行われるのかを説明したものです。この情報は弊社によって適宜更新されますので、この部分を定期的に確認してください。
機能性クッキー
：機能性クッキーは、お客様の希望どおりに当サイトを機能させるために Box が設定するものです。当サイト内での移動や本サービスの利用に、クッキーが必要になる場合があります。弊社は、このようなクッキーを用いなければ、注文の処理などお客様の希望する Box サービスの提供を行うことができません。
弊社は、弊社においてお客様の設定や個人設定（お客様の言語、地域やログイン場所など）を記憶できるよう、お客様が当サイトへログインした際にお客様を認識および記憶するのに役立つ別のクッキーを用います。これらのクッキーも、弊社がお客様の希望するサービスを提供する際に役立つものです。これらのクッキーにより、Box
						のウェブサイト以外におけるお客様の閲覧内容が追跡されることはありません。
下記のとおり、お客様は、これらの機能性クッキーのいずれについても、無効化することができます。ただし、当サイトの様々な機能が利用できなかったり、お客様の希望どおりに動作しなかったりする可能性があります。
パフォーマンスクッキー
：弊社は、お客様による当サイトの利用態様を把握するため、第三者の分析ツールを用いる場合があります。このような分析ツールにより、お客様を特定できる個人データが Box に提供されることはありません。このような分析ツールによって弊社が把握するものには、お客様が Box
						の当サイトに到達するに至った経緯、お客様が以前に閲覧したことがある場合には、当サイトでの滞在時間、当サイトにおいてお客様が閲覧したページなどがあります。また、弊社は、このような分析ツールにより、ユーザーが世界のどこに所在しているかといった一般的な情報を得ることもできます。この情報により、弊社は、皆様による
						Box サービスの利用態様を把握するとともに、当サイトおよび Box サービスにおける皆様の操作性の種類に関する情報を得ることができます。これらはすべて、弊社が Box の操作性をより良いものにするために役立てられます。
クッキーを管理または拒否する方法
クッキーに関する情報やその無効化の方法の詳細については、下記の「
お客様の選択肢
」の項目 をご覧ください。
お客様における選択肢
アカウント情報および保持
お客様は、オンラインアカウントにログインしてご自身に関する情報を変更するか、または弊社まで E メール（
support@box.com
）を送信することにより、お客様の情報を更新、訂正または削除することができます。弊社は、この個人情報保護方針に概説された目的を達するために必要な期間にわたり、お客様の個人情報を保持します。お客様がご自身のアカウントの無効化を希望する場合は、弊社まで E メール（
support@box.com
）にてご連絡ください。ただし、弊社は、法律によって義務づけられている場合や正当な事業目的のために一定の情報を保持することがあります。また、弊社は、お客様に関する情報のキャッシュコピーやアーカイブコピーを一定期間保持することがあります。
販促メッセージ
お客様は、Box からのマーケティングに関するメッセージの受信を「拒否」することができます。弊社からの販促 E メール（ニュースレターを含みます）の受信を拒否するには、その E メールに記載された受信停止に関する説明に従って手続をしてください。また、
support@box.com
に要求内容を記載した E メールを送信して、弊社からの販促 E
						メールやその他の販促メッセージの受信をいつでも拒否することができます。お客様が拒否設定をした場合であっても、販促を目的としないメッセージを送信することがあります。これには、お客様による Box
						サービスのアクセスや利用に関係するセキュリティ警告や通知、お客様のオンラインアカウントや弊社における継続中の取引関係に関するセキュリティ警告や通知などが含まれます。
クッキー、トラッキング技術
大部分のウェブブラウザ（Internet Explorer、FireFox および Safari
					など)は、デフォルト設定として、自動的にクッキーを許可するようになっています。クッキーやその他のトラッキング技術を許可したくない場合は、通常、ブラウザにおいてブラウザクッキーを削除もしくは拒否するか、またはそのようなクッキーを許可する前に確認メッセージを表示させることができます。また、お客様は、設定済みのクッキーを削除することもできます。その方法については、ブラウザの［ヘルプ］機能をご確認ください。あるいは、
www.aboutcookies.org
を閲覧することもお勧めできます。これには、多様なデスクトップブラウザにおける上記の設定方法に関する包括的な情報が記載されています。ブラウザクッキーの削除や拒否を選択すると、Box
						サービスの可用性や機能性に影響が生じる場合がありますので、ご注意ください。
お客様の権利
お客様には、以下の権利があります。
弊社がお客様に関して保有する個人情報について、いつでもコピーの提供を求める権利。ただし、法律に規定された料金の支払いを条件とします。
弊社がお客様に関して保有する個人情報のうち、期限切れまたは不正確なものについて、無償で更新または訂正を求める権利
弊社（またはお客様の同意のもとに弊社からお客様の個人情報の開示を受けた第三者）が送信する一切のマーケティングに関するメッセージを拒否する権利 詳しくは、上記の「
お客様の選択肢
」 をご覧ください。
第三者のウェブサイトへのリンク
弊社は、Box サービス上にリンクを表示する場合があります。弊社のウェブサイトにおいて第三者のウェブサイトをリンク先とするリンクをクリックすると、そのリンク先のウェブサイトにおける動作および利用には、Box
						のウェブサイトの方針ではなく、そのリンク先のウェブサイトの方針が適用されます。第三者のウェブサイトを閲覧する際には、その第三者における個人情報保護およびユーザーに関する方針を確認することをお勧めします。
児童に対する弊社の
方針
Box サービスは、13 歳未満の者を対象としていません。弊社は、故意に 13 歳未満の児童から個人情報を収集することはありません。児童による弊社への個人情報の提供に気付いた場合は、弊社の
support@box.com
までご連絡ください。弊社は、13 歳未満の児童からの個人情報の提供に気付いた場合には、かかる情報を削除する措置を講じます。
弊社へのお問い合わせ
この個人情報保護方針についてご不明な点、ご意見またはご要望がございましたら、
support@box.com
までお問い合わせください。
►
France - Français
Box.com (UK) Ltd (
« Box », « nous », « notre » ou « nos »)
respecte le droit à la vie
						privée des utilisateurs et reconnaît l'importance de la protection et du traitement des informations recueillies à votre sujet,
						conformément à la loi et aux meilleures pratiques.
Cette politique de Box relative à la confidentialité et aux cookies pour les contenus en ligne et mobiles, conjointement avec nos
conditions de
					service
et tout autre document mentionné ci-après («
Politique de confidentialité
») vous indique («
vous
» ou «
votre
»)
						comment vos informations (y compris les données personnelles et/ou des données personnelles sensibles) sont recueillies, utilisées,
						conservées et divulguées par Box, ainsi que les choix spécifiques que vous pouvez faire au sujet de vos informations.
Cette politique de confidentialité s'applique aux informations que nous recueillons lorsque vous utilisez ou accédez à nos sites web en
					ligne ou mobiles disponibles sur www.Box.com («
Site
»), aux produits, services ou applications (collectivement, les «
Services Box
»), ou lorsque vous interagissez autrement avec nous.
Veuillez lire attentivement ce qui suit pour comprendre nos points de vue et pratiques concernant vos données personnelles et la façon dont
							nous allons les traiter.
Concernant la loi de 1998 sur la Protection des données («
la Loi
»), le contrôleur de données est Box.com (UK)
						Limited, de 64 North Row, 2nd floor, London W1K 7LL, Royaume-Uni.
Gardez à l'esprit que Box n'est pas toujours le contrôleur de données pour tous les aspects des services. Certaines données
						personnelles téléchargées ou traitées comme une partie des Services Box seront téléchargées par le contrôleur de
						données ultime. Par exemple, par des employés ou des agents agissant en son nom. Cela peut inclure les données personnelles contenues dans
						des fichiers, des documents ou des images, partagés ou faisant l'objet d'une collaboration à l'aide des Service Box. Dans de telles
						circonstances, Box est le processeur de données agissant au nom de l'ultime contrôleur de données et les Services Box sont
					déployés au nom du contrôleur de données (comme votre employeur ou une université (un «
utilisateur professionnel
»)). Ce contrôleur de données dispose d'un accord d'entreprise distinct avec nous en vertu duquel
						nous agissons en son nom, en utilisant des méthodes techniques et organisationnelles pour sécuriser et protéger les données
						personnelles dont il est responsable.
Par conséquent, si vous êtes utilisateur d'entreprise, les conditions générales du contrat de cette organisation pour les Services Box
						peuvent restreindre notre collecte ou l'utilisation de vos informations encore plus que les conditions générales de cette politique de
						confidentialité. Veuillez donc lire ces termes conjointement à cette politique de confidentialité.
Dans cette politique de confidentialité, les termes « données personnelles » et « données personnelles sensibles »
						auront la signification qui leur est donnée par la loi.
Modifications apportées à cette politique
Nous sommes susceptibles de changer cette politique de confidentialité à tout moment. Lorsque nous apporterons des changements, nous vous en
						avertirons par une révision de la date de « dernière mise à jour » au début de la présente politique de
						confidentialité et, dans certains cas, nous pouvons fournir des avis supplémentaires (telles que l'ajout d'une déclaration sur notre page
						d'accueil ou l'envoi d'une notification par e-mail). Si la politique de confidentialité fait l'objet de changements importants, nous vous en
						informerons plus directement par e-mail. Par conséquent, nous vous encourageons à revoir notre Politique de confidentialité chaque fois que
						vous accédez aux Services Box pour rester informé de nos pratiques en matière d'information et des façons de contribuer à
						protéger votre vie privée.
Si vous êtes en désaccord avec toute modification à la présente politique de confidentialité et ne souhaitez pas que vos
							renseignements soient soumis à politique de confidentialité révisée, vous devrez vous désactiver et arrêter d'utiliser
							les Services Box.
Si vous avez des questions concernant cette Politique de confidentialité ou les informations que nous détenons sur vous, veuillez nous contacter
						comme prévu dans la section
Nous contacter
ci-dessous.
Informations recueillies.
Nous recueillons une variété d'informations qui nous permettent de fournir le Service Box, d'améliorer notre site et de rehausser
					l'expérience des utilisateurs de nos services. Par exemple, en déterminant l'emplacement de votre fournisseur de services Internet («
FAI
»), nous sommes en mesure de fournir une version localisée de notre site (par exemple l'activation du contact, la langue et
						les modifications de devise). Pour plus d'informations sur les fins auxquelles nous utilisons vos informations, veuillez consulter la section
Utilisation
						des Informations
ci-dessous.
Nous recueillons les informations suivantes (qui peut inclure des données personnelles et/ou des données personnelles sensibles) :
Informations que vous nous fournissez.
Nous recueillons les informations que vous fournissez directement lorsque vous utilisez le Site et lorsque vous vous inscrivez et utilisez les Services
						Box. Les exemples incluent :
· Nous recueillons des informations lorsque vous vous inscrivez auprès de Box pour un compte, créez ou modifiez votre profil et le compte en
						ligne, accédez aux et utilisez les Services Box (y compris, mais sans limite, lorsque vous chargez, téléchargez, collaborez sur ou partagez
						des fichiers ou d'autres informations), participez à des fonctions interactives des Services Box, participez à un sondage, un concours, une
						promotion, des loteries promotionnelles, une activité ou un événement, pour effectuer un achat, une demande d'emploi, une demande assistance
						à la clientèle, communiquer avec nous via des sites sociaux tiers ou communiquer autrement avec nous.
· Les types de renseignements que nous pouvons recueillir directement auprès de vous incluent votre nom, votre nom d'utilisateur, votre adresse
						électronique, votre adresse postale, votre numéro de téléphone, des informations sur vos préférences de stockage de
						données, le nom de votre employeur, l'intitulé de votre poste, des informations transactionnelles (y compris les services achetés ou
						souscrits et l'adresse de facturation) ainsi que tout contact ou toute autre information que vous choisissez de nous fournir. Nous stockons également
						des fichiers ou d'autres informations que vous chargez sur les Services Box ou que vous fournissez aux Services Box («
Contenu
»).
· Si vous fournissez des informations (y compris des données à caractère personnel) concernant un tiers, vous confirmez qu'il vous a
						mandaté pour agir en son nom, et qu'il consent au traitement de ses données personnelles, et que vous l'avez informé de notre identité
						et des fins (telles que définies dans la Politique de confidentialité) auxquelles leurs données personnelles seront traitées.
Informations que nous recueillons automatiquement
Lorsque vous accédez ou utilisez les Services Box, nous pouvons recueillir automatiquement des informations vous concernant, y compris :
Informations d'utilisation :
Dans le cadre des Services Box, nous surveillons l'activité de l'utilisateur et pouvons collecter des informations sur les applications et les
							fonctionnalités que vous utilisez, les sites web que vous visitez, les tailles et les noms des fichiers ou des dossiers que vous chargez,
							téléchargez, partagez ou auxquels vous accédez via les Services Box, le contenu auquel vous accédez et toute action relative à
							l'accès et l'utilisation de votre contenu dans les Services Box.
Informations du journal :
Nous consignons des informations sur vous lorsque vous accédez et utilisez les Services Box y compris votre protocole Internet («
IP
»), votre adresse, les temps d'accès, le type et la langue du navigateur, le FAI, les pages Web que vous visitez, le
							contenu que vous utilisez et l'URL de la page Web que vous avez visitée avant d'arriver sur les Services Box.
Informations sur le périphérique :
Si vous accédez aux Services Box à partir d'un périphérique mobile, nous collectons des informations sur le périphérique,
							y compris le modèle de matériel, le système d'exploitation et sa version, les identificateurs uniques du périphérique mobile,
							les informations sur le réseau mobile (dans la mesure autorisée par le réseau mobile) ou les informations sur la plate-forme (dans la
							mesure autorisée par le type spécifique de plate-forme).
Informations
collectées par les cookies et autres technologies de suivi :
Nous utilisons diverses technologies de suivi telles que les cookies et les balises web pour recueillir des informations et vous distinguer des autres
							utilisateurs de notre Site, qui peuvent inclure l'enregistrement des cookies sur votre ordinateur ou un périphérique mobile. Cela nous permet
							de vous fournir une expérience satisfaisante lorsque vous naviguez et utilisez nos Services Box et nous permet également d'améliorer nos
							Services Box. Pour plus d'informations sur la manière dont nous utilisons les cookies et autres technologies de suivi, veuillez consulter la
							section consacrée aux
cookies
.
Informations que nous recueillons à partir d'autres sources.
Nous pouvons également obtenir des renseignements auprès de tiers et les combiner avec des informations que nous collectons via les Services Box.
						Par exemple, nous pouvons avoir accès à certaines informations à partir d'un site social tiers si vous créez un compte ou vous
						connectez à votre compte en ligne via ce service, ou nous fournissez autrement l'accès à vos informations à partir de ce service. Tout
						accès que nous sommes susceptibles d'avoir à de telles informations auprès d'un site de réseau social tiers est en conformité avec
						les procédures d'autorisation déterminées par ledit site de réseau social.
Utilisation des informations.
Nous pouvons utiliser les informations (ce qui peut inclure les données personnelles) que nous recueillons sur vous à des fins diverses, y
						compris :
Fournir, exploiter, maintenir et améliorer les Services Box ;
· Vous permettre d'accéder et d'utiliser les Services Box, y compris le chargement, le téléchargement, la collaboration et le partage
						de contenu et l'envoi d'e-mails en votre nom ;
· Vous envoyer des avis techniques, mises à jour, alertes de sécurité et messages d'assistance et administratifs ;
· Fournir et livrer les services et les fonctionnalités que vous demandez, traiter et effectuer des transactions, et vous envoyer les
						informations associées, y compris des confirmations d'achat et des factures ;
Répondre à vos commentaires, questions et demandes et fournir une assistance et un service à la clientèle ;
· Communiquer avec vous, lorsque vous l'acceptez ou lorsque la loi l'autorise, à des fins de marketing, y compris de vous informer
						régulièrement sur les services, les fonctionnalités, les enquêtes, les bulletins d'information, les offres, les promotions, les
						concours et les événements, et fournir d'autres informations ou des informations à propos de Box et de nos partenaires privilégiés
						; nous partagerons vos informations personnelles avec autrui uniquement à des fins de marketing et/ou nous vous enverrons du matériel
						promotionnel uniquement avec votre consentement. Pour plus d'informations sur la manière de modifier vos préférences et vous désabonner
						de matériels promotionnels (y compris des bulletins d'information, des messages marketing et des notifications par e-mail), veuillez consulter la
						section
Vos options
ci-dessous.
Traitement et livraisons des entrées et récompenses de concours ou loteries promotionnelles ;
Surveiller et analyser les tendances, l'utilisation et les activités en relation avec les Services Box et à des fins de marketing ou de
							publicité ;
Enquêter sur et prévenir les opérations frauduleuses, l'accès non autorisé aux Services Box, et d'autres activités
							illégales ;
Personnaliser et améliorer les Services Box, et fournir du contenu, des fonctions et/ou des annonces qui correspondent à vos
							intérêts et vos préférences ou personnaliser autrement votre expérience sur les Services Box ;
Lier ou combiner avec d'autres informations que nous recevons de tierces parties, pour les aider à comprendre vos besoins et vous fournir un
							meilleur service ;
Vous permettre de communiquer, de collaborer et de partager des fichiers avec des utilisateurs que vous désignez ; et
À d'autres fins dont nous vous informerons.
Emplacement du stockage de vos informations
Box est basée au Royaume-Uni, mais nous pouvons stocker et traiter des renseignements personnels et du contenu aux États-Unis et dans d'autres
						pays via notre filiale américaine Box, Inc. En accédant ou en utilisant les Services Box ou en nous fournissant autrement des informations, vous
						autorisez le traitement et le transfert des informations aux et vers les États-Unis (où elles sont stockées en notre nom par Box Inc. et ses
						agents) et d'autres pays et territoires, qui peuvent disposer de lois sur la protection de la vie privée différentes de votre pays de
						résidence.
Box Inc. adhère aux principes de confidentialité du programme « Sphère de sécurité » du Département du commerce des
						États-Unis concernant la collecte, l'utilisation et la conservation des renseignements personnels de l'Union européenne, et aux principes de
						confidentialité du programme « Sphère de sécurité suisse » du Département du commerce des États-Unis concernant la
						collecte, l'utilisation et la conservation de renseignements personnels provenant de la Suisse. Les certifications « Sphère de sécurité
					» de Box Inc. peuvent être examinées à l'adresse :
http://safeharbor.export.gov/companyinfo.aspx?id=15927
. Pour plus d'informations sur
					les principes de la sphère de sécurité, veuillez consulter le site Web du Département du commerce des États-Unis à l'adresse
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
Si vous avez des questions concernant la présente Politique de confidentialité, vous devez d'abord nous contacter à
support@box.com
.
Partage et divulgation d'informations.
Nous ne partagerons pas d'informations personnelles vous concernant, ni de contenu avec des tiers, sauf dans les limites décrites dans cette politique
						de confidentialité ou en relation avec les Services Box. Par exemple, il se peut que nous partagions des renseignements personnels à votre sujet
						comme suit :
Fournisseurs, les consultants et autres prestataires de services :
nous pouvons partager vos informations avec des tiers fournisseurs, consultants et autres prestataires de services qui travaillent en notre nom et
							nécessitent l'accès à vos informations pour effectuer ce travail.
Compte d'entreprise :
Si vous êtes un utilisateur Box enregistré et que le domaine de l'adresse e-mail principale associée à votre compte Box est la
							propriété de votre employeur et vous a été affecté en tant qu'employé de l'organisation, et que cette organisation
							souhaite établir un compte d'entreprise Box, certaines informations concernant l'utilisation passée de votre compte peuvent devenir
							accessibles à l'administrateur de cette organisation, y compris votre adresse e-mail.
Avec votre consentement :
nous pouvons partager vos informations avec votre consentement, y compris lorsque vous choisissez d'utiliser les fonctionnalités de collaboration
							des Services Box qui, du fait de leur nature, prennent en charge le partage avec les tiers qui vous choisissez. Votre nom, votre adresse e-mail, les
							informations de votre profil et de votre compte en ligne (y compris votre photo), et tout contenu que vous choisissez de partager, seront partagés
							avec ces tierces parties, et ces tierces parties peuvent communiquer avec vous (par exemple, en postant des commentaires ou par l'envoi d'un e-mail) en
							liaison avec votre utilisation des fonctionnalités de collaboration des Services Box. Par exemple, les tierces parties que vous invitez à
							collaborer avec vous en tant qu'« éditeurs » à l'aide des fonctionnalités de collaboration des Services Box peuvent
							également modifier le contenu que vous avez partagé, télécharger des documents et des photos dans du contenu que vous avez
							partagé, partager ce contenu en dehors des Services Box, et donner à d'autres tiers le droit d'afficher le contenu que vous avez
							partagé.
Applications tierces :
Box vous donne la possibilité de vous connecter avec des applications ou services tiers, tels que notre nuage Box OneCloud ou
							l'écosystème partenaire d'applications Box. Si vous choisissez d'utiliser l'une de ces applications tierces ou l'un de ces services tiers,
							nous sommes susceptibles de partager des informations vous concernant, notamment votre nom d'utilisateur et tout contenu que vous choisissez d'utiliser
							en lien avec ces applications et services, et de telles tierces parties peuvent vous contacter directement, le cas échéant. Cette politique
							de confidentialité ne s'applique pas à votre utilisation de ces applications et services tiers, et nous ne sommes pas responsables de la
							manière dont ces tiers recueillent, utilisent et divulguent vos renseignements et votre contenu. Nous vous encourageons à consulter les
							politiques de confidentialité de ces tiers avant de vous connecter ou d'utiliser leurs services ou applications, afin d'en savoir plus sur leurs
							pratiques en matière d'informations et de confidentialité.
Respect des lois :
nous pouvons être amenés à divulguer vos informations à un tiers (a) si nous croyons que la divulgation est raisonnablement
							nécessaire pour se conformer à toute loi applicable, tout règlement, tout processus juridique ou toute demande gouvernementale, (b) pour
							faire respecter nos accords, politiques et conditions de service, (c) pour protéger la sécurité ou l'intégrité des Services
							Box, (d) pour protéger, nos clients ou le public de dommages ou d'activités illégales, ou (e) pour répondre à une situation
							d'urgence pour laquelle nous estimons en toute bonne foi être obligé de divulguer des informations pour contribuer à empêcher la
							mort d'une personne ou des lésions corporelles graves.
Transfert d'entreprise :
nous pouvons divulguer vos informations personnelles à des tiers :
o Si nous vendons, fusionnons ou achetons tout ou une partie substantielle de toute entreprise ou d'actifs, nous pouvons divulguer vos données
						personnelles au vendeur potentiel, partenaire de fusion ou acheteur de ces actifs ou de cette entreprise ; ou
o Si Box.com (UK) Limited et/ou nos autres sociétés du groupe (y compris notre parent ultime Box Inc.) ou la quasi-totalité de ses actifs
						sont acquis par un tiers, auquel cas, les données à caractère personnel détenues par elle sur ses clients feront partie des actifs
						transférés.
.
Données agrégées ou rendues anonymes :
Nous pouvons également partager des informations agrégées ou rendues anonymes avec des tiers sans directement vous identifier.
Notre groupe :
nous pouvons divulguer vos informations personnelles à tout membre de notre groupe, soit toute entreprise qui contrôle Box, est
							contrôlée par Box ou est sous contrôle commun avec Box.
Fonctions de collaboration et de partage.
Les Services Box offrent des fonctions de collaboration ou d'autres outils intégrés qui vous permettent de partager votre contenu via les
						Services Box. Du fait de la nature collaborative des Services Box et en fonction des autorisations et des paramètres que vous choisissez,
						l'utilisation de ces fonctions permet le partage de contenu avec les personnes avec lesquelles vous souhaitez collaborer ou avec le public. Vous pouvez
						choisir de modifier vos paramètres à tout moment pour un fichier ou un dossier à partir de votre compte. Pour plus d'informations sur ces
					fonctions de collaboration et de partage, nous vous encourageons à passer en revue les informations fournies sur
success.box.com
.
Sécurité.
Bien qu'aucun service ne soit complètement sécurisé, Box prend des mesures raisonnables pour contribuer à protéger vos
						informations personnelles contre la perte, le vol, l'utilisation abusive et l'accès non autorisé, la divulgation, l'altération et la
						destruction. Par exemple, nous chiffrons votre contenu lorsqu'il est stocké dans nos centres de données. En outre, des informations
						confidentielles, telles que le numéro de carte de crédit et le mot de passe qui vous sont demandées par les Services Box sont
						protégées par un chiffrage, comme le protocole SSL (Secured Socket Layer) lors de la transmission sur Internet.
Les serveurs sur lesquels les renseignements personnels sont stockés sont conservés dans un environnement contrôlé avec un accès
						limité. Nous prenons toutes les mesures raisonnables pour la protection des renseignements personnels que nous percevons directement de votre part,
						mais aucun système de sécurité n'est impénétrable et en raison de la nature inhérente d'Internet comme véhicule de
						communications ouvert et mondial, nous ne pouvons pas garantir que l'information, lors de sa transmission par le biais d'Internet ou du stockage sur nos
						systèmes ou autrement par nos soins, sera protégée entièrement contre une intrusion par des tiers, comme les pirates informatiques. En
						outre, nous ne pouvons garantir que les informations personnelles recueillies de manière passive que vous choisissez d'inclure dans les documents que
						vous stockez sur nos systèmes soient gérées selon des niveaux de protection répondant à des besoins spécifiques ou aux
						obligations que vous pourriez avoir relativement à ces informations.
Vous pouvez accéder à vos informations de compte et à notre service uniquement grâce à l'utilisation d'un ID utilisateur
						individuel et d'un mot de passe. Pour protéger la confidentialité des informations personnelles, vous devez garder votre mot de passe
						confidentiel et ne pas le divulguer à un tiers. Veuillez nous informer immédiatement si vous croyez que votre mot de passe a été
						utilisé à mauvais escient. En outre, déconnectez et fermez toujours votre navigateur lorsque vous avez terminé votre session. Veuillez
						noter que nous ne vous demanderons jamais de divulguer votre mot de passe via un appel téléphonique ou un e-mail non sollicité.
Politique en matière de cookies.
Nous utilisons diverses technologies de suivi telles que les cookies et les balises web pour recueillir des informations et vous distinguer des autres
						utilisateurs des Services Box, qui peuvent inclure l'enregistrement des cookies sur votre ordinateur ou un périphérique mobile. Cela nous permet
						de vous fournir une expérience satisfaisante lorsque vous naviguez et utilisez nos Services Box et nous permet également d'améliorer nos
						Services Box.
Qu'est-ce qu'un cookie ?
Les cookies sont de petits fichiers de données qui peuvent être stockés sur votre navigateur ou sur le disque dur de votre ordinateur si
						vous êtes d'accord. Les cookies contiennent des informations qui sont transférées vers votre disque dur.
Qu'est-ce qu'une balise web ?
Une balise web (également connue sous le nom de « pixels de surveillance ») est une image électronique, aussi appelé « gif
						» qui peut être utilisée dans les services Box ou dans les e-mails pour nous aider à fournir des cookies, effectuer le comptage des
						visites, comprendre l'utilisation et l'efficacité des campagnes et déterminer si un e-mail a été ouvert et utilisé.
Comment utilisons-nous ces technologies ?
Nous utilisons les cookies et les balises web pour améliorer les Services Box et votre expérience, personnaliser votre expérience et vos
						préférences, vous permettre d'accéder et d'utiliser les Services Box sans avoir à entrer de nouveau votre ID de membre et/ou mot de
						passe, comprendre quels sont les domaines et les fonctions des Services Box les plus populaires et compter les visites.
Quels cookies utilisons-nous ?
Vous trouverez ci-dessous un aperçu des catégories de cookies utilisés sur notre Site, et une description de la destination de ces cookies.
						Veuillez consulter cette section périodiquement, ces informations pouvant être mises à jour à tout moment :
Cookies fonctionnels
: les cookies fonctionnels sont ceux que Box définit pour que le site fonctionne tel qu'attendu. Certains cookies sont nécessaires pour vous
						permettre de vous déplacer sur notre Site et utiliser les Services. Sans ces cookies, nous ne sommes pas en mesure de fournir les Services Box que
						vous avez demandé, comme le traitement de vos commandes.
Nous utilisons d'autres cookies pour que les Services puissent vous reconnaître et se souvenir de vous lorsque vous vous êtes connecté au
						site, et se rappeler vos paramètres et préférences, telles que votre langue et région ou état de connexion. Ces cookies peuvent
						également nous aider à offrir les services que vous avez demandé. Ces cookies ne surveillent pas votre activité de navigation, ni les
						sites web autres que ceux de Box.
Comme décrit ci-dessous, vous pouvez désactiver tous les cookies fonctionnels, mais si vous procédez ainsi, diverses fonctions du site
						peuvent devenir indisponibles ou ne pas fonctionner de la façon dont vous le souhaitez.
Cookies de performance
: Nous utilisons des outils d'analyse tiers pour mieux comprendre comment vous utilisez notre site. Ces outils d'analyse ne fournissent pas à Box de
						données personnelles permettant de vous identifier. Ils nous indiquent comment vous êtes arrivés sur le site Box, si vous avez
						déjà visité ce site antérieurement, combien de temps vous restez sur le Site et les pages du Site que vous avez visitées. Ils
						peuvent également nous fournir des informations générales sur la position d'un utilisateur dans le monde. Ces informations nous aident
						à comprendre comment les visiteurs utilisent les Services Box, et nous fournissent des renseignements sur le genre d'expérience des visiteurs
						utilisant notre Site et les Services Box. Cela nous permet d'améliorer continuellement l'expérience Box.
Comment puis-je gérer ou de refuser les cookies ?
Pour plus d'informations sur les cookies et la façon de les désactiver, veuillez consulter la section «
Vos options
» ci-dessous.
Vos options.
Informations de compte et conservation.
Vous pouvez mettre à jour, corriger ou supprimer les informations vous concernant à tout moment en vous connectant à votre compte en ligne
						et en modifiant vos informations ou en nous envoyant un e-mail à l'adresse
support@box.com
. Nous conserverons vos
						renseignements personnels pour la période nécessaire aux fins décrites dans la présente Politique de confidentialité. Si vous
						souhaitez désactiver votre compte, veuillez nous envoyer un e-mail à l'adresse
support@box.com
. Notez que
						nous pouvons conserver certaines informations comme requis par la loi ou à des fins commerciales légitimes. Nous pouvons aussi conserver des
						informations vous concernant en mémoire cache ou sous forme de copies d'archives pour une certaine période.
Communications promotionnelles.
Vous pouvez vous exclure de la réception de communications marketing de Box. Pour arrêter de recevoir des e-mails promotionnels (y compris des
						bulletins) de notre part, suivez les instructions d'exclusion fournies dans ces e-mails. Vous pouvez également choisir de ne pas recevoir les e-mails
					promotionnels et autres communications promotionnelles de notre part à tout moment en envoyant un e-mail à l'adresse
support@box.com
avec votre demande spécifique. Si vous vous désinscrivez, nous pouvons toujours vous envoyer
						des communications non promotionnelles, telles que les alertes de sécurité et les avis liés à votre utilisation ou à l'accès
						aux Services Box ou les avis relatifs à votre compte en ligne ou à nos relations commerciales.
Cookies/technologies de suivi.
La plupart des navigateurs web (tel qu'Internet Explorer, Firefox et Safari) sont automatiquement configurés pour accepter les cookies par
						défaut. Si vous ne souhaitez pas recevoir de cookies ou d'autres technologies de suivi, vous pouvez généralement choisir de configurer votre
						navigateur de façon à ce qu'il supprime ou rejette les cookies, ou vous invite avant d'accepter un cookie. Vous pouvez également supprimer
						les cookies qui ont déjà été définis. La fonction d'aide de votre navigateur peut vous expliquer comment. Vous pouvez
						également visiter le site
www.aboutcookies.org
, qui contient des informations complètes sur la
						façon de procéder pour une grande variété de navigateurs de bureau. Veuillez noter que si vous choisissez de retirer ou de refuser les
						cookies de votre navigateur, cela pourrait affecter la disponibilité ou la fonctionnalité des Services Box.
Vos droits.
Vous disposez des droits suivants :
· le droit de nous demander de vous fournir des copies des informations personnelles que nous détenons sur vous à tout moment, sous
						réserve d'une redevance spécifiée par la loi ;
· le droit de nous demander gratuitement de mettre à jour et corriger toutes les informations périmées ou inexactes que nous
						détenons sur vous ; et
le droit de vous retirer de toute communication de marketing que nous (ou un tiers à qui nous avons communiqué vos renseignements personnels avec
						votre consentement) pouvons vous envoyer. Veuillez consulter la section «
Vos options
» ci-dessus pour plus d'informations.
Liens vers des sites web tiers.
Nous pouvons placer des liens sur les Services Box. Lorsque vous cliquez sur un lien vers un site web tiers sur notre site web, votre activité et sur
						le site web lié et son utilisation sont régies par les politiques de ce site web et non pas par celles de Box. Nous vous encourageons à
						visiter leurs sites web et examiner leurs politiques relatives à la vie privée et aux utilisateurs.
Notre politique à l'égard des enfants.
Les Services Box ne sont pas destinés aux personnes de moins de 13 ans. Nous ne collectons pas sciemment d'informations personnelles auprès
					d'enfants de moins de 13 ans. Si vous avez connaissance qu'un enfant nous a fourni des informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter à l'adresse
support@box.com
. Si nous apprenons qu'un enfant de moins de 13 ans nous a fourni des informations personnelles, nous
						prendrons des mesures pour supprimer ces informations.
Contactez-nous.
Les questions, commentaires et demandes concernant la présente Politique de confidentialité doivent être adressés à l'adresse
support@box.com
.
►
Italia - Italiano
Box.com (UK) Ltd ("
Box
")rispetta il diritto alla privacy degli utenti e riconosce l'importanza di proteggere e trattare le informazioni
						raccolte sull'utente in modo conforme alle leggi e alle best practice.
La presente Informativa sulla privacy e sull'uso dei cookie di Box Online e Mobile, insieme ai
Termini del servizio
e a tutti gli altri documenti indicati di seguito ("
Informativa sulla privacy
")
						spiega all'utente ("
utente
")
le modalità con cui le informazioni che lo riguardano (inclusi i dati personali e/o i
						dati personali sensibili) vengono raccolte, archiviate e divulgate da Box e le scelte specifiche che l'utente può esprimere in merito a tali
						informazioni.
La presente Informativa sulla privacy si applica alle informazioni raccolte da Box quando l'utente accede o utilizza il nostro Sito Web online o mobile
					disponibile all'indirizzo www.Box.com ("
Sito
"), nonché i nostri prodotti, servizi o applicazioni (collettivamente, i "
Servizi Box
"), o a qualsiasi altra interazione tra l'utente e Box.
Per conoscere le politiche e le prassi di Box in merito ai dati personali dell'utente e al loro trattamento, leggere attentamente quanto riportato di
							seguito.
Ai sensi del Data Protection Act 1998 ("
l'Atto
"), il controllore dei dati è Box.com (UK) Limited con sede in 64 North Row, 2nd floor, London W1K 7LL, Regno Unito.
Si fa qui presente che Box non è sempre il controllore dei dati per tutti gli aspetti inerenti ai servizi. Alcuni dati personali caricati o elaborati
						nell'ambito dei Servizi Box verranno caricati dal controllore finale dei dati, ad esempio dai dipendenti o dagli agenti che agiscono per suo conto. Tali
						dati possono includere informazioni personali contenute in file, documenti o immagini utilizzati per scopi di condivisione o collaborazione per mezzo dei
						Servizi Box. In tali circostanze, Box è l'elaboratore dei dati che agisce per conto del controllore finale dei dati, e i Servizi Box vengono
					distribuiti per conto del controllore dei dati (ad esempio, il datore di lavoro dell'utente o un istituto universitario (un "
Utente aziendale
"). Tale controllore dei dati è vincolato a Box da un accordo aziendale a parte che autorizza Box ad agire per suo
						conto utilizzando metodi organizzativi e tecnici atti a proteggere e tenere al sicuro i dati personali di cui il controllore è responsabile.
Pertanto, nel caso di un Utente aziendale, i termini del contratto con l'organizzazione che deve utilizzare i servizi Box possono limitare la raccolta o
						l'uso delle informazioni dell'utente da parte di Box rispetto a quanto previsto dalla presente Informativa sulla privacy. Per questo motivo, oltre alla
						presente Informativa sulla privacy, è necessario leggere i termini di tale contratto.
Nella presente Informativa sulla privacy, il significato dei termini "dati personali" e "dati sensibili" è quello descritto nell'Atto.
Modifiche alla presente Informativa
Box si riserva il diritto di modificare di quando in quando la presente Informativa sulla privacy. In caso di modifiche, queste verranno comunicate
						all'utente con la data "Ultimo aggiornamento" riportata all'inizio della presente Informativa sulla privacy e, in alcuni casi, con un ulteriore avviso (ad
						esempio, l'aggiunta di una dichiarazione sulla homepage di Box o l'invio di una notifica all'indirizzo e-mail dell'utente). Qualora le modifiche alla
						presente Informativa sulla privacy siano di natura sostanziale, l'utente sarà informato direttamente via e-mail. L'utente è quindi invitato a di
						rivedere l'Informativa sulla privacy di Box ogni volta che accede ai Servizi Box, per essere sempre informato sulle prassi di Box relative al trattamento
						delle informazioni e alla protezione della privacy dell'utente.
Se in disaccordo con qualsivoglia modifica alla presente Informativa sulla privacy e qualora non acconsenta che le sue informazioni siano soggette alla
							nuova Informativa sulla privacy, l'utente dovrà disattivare il suo account Box e interrompere l'uso dei Servizi Box.
Per qualsiasi domanda sulla presente Informativa sulla privacy o sul modo in cui Box tratta le informazioni che lo riguardano, l'utente è pregato di
						contattare Box come indicato nella sezione
Per contattare Box
riportata più avanti.
Informazioni raccolte
Box raccoglie una varietà di informazioni allo scopo di poter fornire i Servizi Box, migliorare il suo Sito e ottimizzare l'esperienza degli utenti
						dei suoi servizi; ad esempio, localizzando l'
ISP
(Internet Service Provider) dell'utente, è in grado di fornire una versione
						localizzata del suo Sito con i contatti, la lingua e la valuta appropriati. Per ulteriori informazioni sugli scopi per cui Box utilizza le informazioni
						dell'utente, leggere la sezione
Uso delle informazioni
riportata più avanti.
Box raccoglie le seguenti informazioni (che possono includere dati personali e/o dati personali sensibili):
Informazioni fornite a Box dall'utente
Box raccoglie le informazioni che l'utente fornisce direttamente a Box quando utilizza il Sito e quando si iscrive ai Servizi Box e li utilizza. Alcuni
						esempi:
· Box raccoglie informazioni quando l'utente: si iscrive a Box e crea un account, crea o modifica il suo profilo e il suo account online, accede e
						utilizza i Servizi Box (incluse, a scopo esemplificativo, le operazioni di upload, download, collaborazione e condivisione di file o altre informazioni),
						prende parte a qualsivoglia funzione interattiva dei Servizi Box, partecipa a sondaggi, concorsi, promozioni, lotterie, attività o eventi, effettua un
						acquisto, presenta una domanda di lavoro, richiede l'assistenza clienti, comunica con Box utilizzando i siti di social media di terzi o altri metodi.
· I tipi di informazioni che Box raccoglie direttamente dall'utente includono: nome, nome utente, indirizzo e-mail, indirizzo postale, numero di
						telefono, informazioni sulle preferenze di archiviazione dei dati, nome del datore di lavoro, qualifica professionale, informazioni sulle transazioni
						(inclusi servizi acquistati o iscrizioni a servizi e indirizzo di fatturazione), oltre a qualsivoglia altra informazione di contatto o di altro tipo che
					l'utente decide di fornire. Box, inoltre, archivia i file e le altre informazioni che l'utente carica o rende disponibili sui Servizi Box ("
Contenuti
").
· Fornendo informazioni (incluse le informazioni personali) su una terza persona, l'utente dichiara che tale persona lo ha autorizzato ad agire per
						suo conto e acconsente al trattamento dei suoi dati personali, e che l'utente ha informato la persona circa l'identità di Box e gli scopi (descritti
						nella presente Informativa sulla privacy) per cui i suoi dati personali saranno trattati.
Informazioni raccolte automaticamente da Box
Quando l'utente accede o utilizza i Servizi Box, Box può raccogliere automaticamente alcune informazioni sull'utente, tra cui:
Informazioni sull'uso:
Box monitora l'attività dell'utente in relazione ai Servizi Box e può raccogliere informazioni sulle applicazioni e le funzioni utilizzate, i
							siti Web visitati, le dimensioni e i nomi delle cartelle o dei file caricati, scaricati, condivisi o aperti durante l'uso dei Servizi Box, i Contenuti
							consultati e qualsiasi azione intrapresa dall'utente in relazione all'accesso e all'uso dei suoi contenuti nei Servizi Box.
Informazioni di registro:
Box registra le informazioni sull'utente quando questi accede e utilizza i Servizi Box, inclusi: indirizzo
IP
(Internet Protocol), ora
							di accesso, lingua e tipo di browser, ISP, pagine Web visitate e Contenuti utilizzati, URL della pagina Web visitata prima di accedere ai Servizi Box.
Informazioni sul dispositivo:
se l'utente accede ai Servizi Box da un dispositivo mobile, Box raccoglie informazioni su tale dispositivo, tra cui: modello hardware, tipo e versione
							del sistema operativo, ID del dispositivo, informazioni sulla rete mobile (consentite dalla rete) o sulla piattaforma (consentite dal tipo specifico di
							piattaforma).
Informazioni
raccolte dai cookie e da altre tecnologie di tracciamento:
per raccogliere informazioni e distinguere un utente specifico dagli altri utenti del proprio Sito, Box si avvale di diverse tecnologie di
							tracciamento, ad esempio cookie e Web beacon, che possono richiedere il salvataggio di cookie nel computer o nel dispositivo mobile dell'utente. Grazie
							a queste tecnologie, Box è in grado di offrire un'esperienza ottimale all'utente che accede e utilizza i suoi Servizi Box e di migliorare questi
					ultimi. Per ulteriori informazioni su come Box utilizza i cookie e le altre tecnologie di tracciamento, vedere
la sezione Cookie
.
Informazioni che Box raccoglie da altre fonti
Box può anche ottenere informazioni da soggetti terzi e combinarle con quelle che raccoglie attraverso i Servizi Box. Ad esempio, Box può avere
						accesso ad alcune informazioni da un servizio social media di terzi se l'utente crea o accede un account online tramite tale servizio o fornisce altrimenti
						a Box l'accesso alle informazioni da tale servizio. L'accesso a tali informazioni da un servizio social media di terzi avviene in conformità alle
						procedure di autorizzazione previste dal servizio social media in questione.
Uso delle informazioni
Box può utilizzare le informazioni (che possono includere dati personali) che raccoglie sull'utente per una varietà di scopi, tra cui:
fornire, gestire, manutenere e migliorare i Servizi Box;
· consentire all'utente l'accesso ai Servizi Box e il loro uso, incluse le operazioni per caricare, scaricare, condividere i contenuti e collaborare
						ad essi e inviare e-mail per conto dell'utente;
· inviare all'utente notifiche tecniche, aggiornamenti, avvisi di sicurezza e messaggi di assistenza o amministrativi;
· fornire e distribuire i servizi e le funzioni richiesti dall'utente, elaborare e completare le transazioni e inviare all'utente le informazioni
						correlate, incluse le conferme di acquisto e le fatture;
rispondere ai commenti, alle domande e alle richieste dell'utente e fornire assistenza e supporto al cliente;
· comunicare con l'utente, nei casi consentiti dalla legge o per i quali l'utente ha espresso il suo consenso, per scopi commerciali, ad esempio per
						informare periodicamente l'utente di servizi, funzioni, sondaggi, newsletter, offerte, promozioni, concorsi ed eventi e fornire altre notizie o
						informazioni su Box e sui suoi partner selezionati; Box condividerà i dati personali dell'utente con altri soggetti solo per scopi di marketing e/o
						per inviare materiali promozionali all'utente, previo il consenso di quest'ultimo. Per ulteriori informazioni su come modificare le preferenze e revocare
					l'assenso a ricevere materiali promozionali (inclusi messaggi marketing, newsletter e notifiche via e-mail), vedere
la sezione Opzioni per l'utente
riportata più avanti.
elaborare e distribuire iscrizioni e premi per concorsi o lotterie;
monitorare e analizzare tendenze, uso e attività in relazione ai Servizi Box e per scopi commerciali o pubblicitari;
indagare su transazioni fraudolente, accessi non autorizzati ai Servizi Box e altre attività illegali, per prevenire tali eventi;
personalizzare e migliorare i Servizi Box e offrire contenuti, funzioni e/o annunci pubblicitari idonei agli interessi e alle preferenze dell'utente, o
							personalizzare altrimenti l'esperienza di quest'ultimo in relazione ai Servizi Box;
creare collegamenti o combinazioni con altre informazioni ricevute da soggetti terzi per capire meglio le esigenze dell'utente e offrirgli un servizio
							migliore;
permettere all'utente di comunicare, collaborare e condividere file con gli utenti da lui designati; e
per altri scopi di volta in volta notificati all'utente.
Dove vengono archiviate le informazioni sull'utente raccolte da Box
Box ha sede nel Regno Unito, ma può archiviare ed elaborare contenuti e informazioni personali negli Stati Uniti e in altri paesi attraverso la sua
						filiale statunitense Box Inc. Accedendo o utilizzando i Servizi Box o fornendo altrimenti informazioni a Box, l'utente acconsente al trattamento e al
						trasferimento delle informazioni verso e dagli Stati Uniti (dove vengono archiviate per suo conto da Box Inc. e dai suoi agenti) e altri paesi e territori
						che possono essere regolati da leggi sulla privacy diverse dal paese di residenza dell'utente.
Box Inc. aderisce ai principi di privacy Safe Harbor dello U.S. Department of Commerce che regolano la raccolta, l'uso e la conservazione delle
						informazioni personali provenienti dall'Unione Europea e ai principi di privacy U.S. Swiss Safe Harbor dello U.S. Department of Commerce che regolano la
						raccolta, l'uso e la conservazione delle informazioni personali provenienti dalla Svizzera. Le certificazioni Safe Harbor di Box Inc. possono essere
						verificate all'indirizzo
http://safeharbor.export.gov/companyinfo.aspx?id=15927
. Per
					ulteriori informazioni sui principi Safe Harbor, visitare il sito Web dello U.S. Department of Commerce all'indirizzo
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
Per domande sulla presente Informativa sulla privacy, contattare per prima cosa Box all'indirizzo
support@box.com
.
Condivisione e divulgazione delle informazioni
Box non condividerà informazioni personali o Contenuti dell'utente con soggetti terzi, salvo nei casi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla
						privacy o in relazione ai Servizi Box. Ad esempio, Box può condividere le informazioni personali dell'utente nei seguenti casi:
Fornitori, consulenti e altri service provider:
Box può condividere le informazioni sull'utente con fornitori terzi, consulenti e altri service provider che lavorano per conto dell'utente e
							richiedono l'accesso alle informazioni di quest'ultimo per poter svolgere tale lavoro.
Account aziendale:
se l'utente è iscritto ai servizi Box come utente individuale e il dominio dell'indirizzo e-mail primario associato al suo account Box appartiene
							al suo datore di lavoro e gli è stato assegnato in quanto dipendente dell'organizzazione in questione, e se tale organizzazione desidera creare un
							account Box aziendale, è possibile che alcune informazioni riguardanti l'uso passato dell'account individuale dell'utente (incluso l'indirizzo
							e-mail dell'utente) diventino accessibili all'amministratore dell'organizzazione.
Consenso dell'utente:
Box può condividere informazioni sull'utente dietro consenso di quest'ultimo, se questi sceglie di utilizzare le funzioni collaborative dei
							Servizi Box che, per loro natura, supportano la condivisione con soggetti terzi scelti dall'utente. Il nome, l'indirizzo e-mail e le informazioni del
							profilo e l'account online dell'utente (inclusa la sua foto) e qualsivoglia contenuto che l'utente scelga di condividere saranno condivisi con tali
							soggetti terzi, e tali soggetti terzi potranno comunicare con l'utente (ad esempio pubblicando commenti o inviando e-mail all'utente) in relazione
							all'uso delle funzioni di collaborazione dei Servizi Box da parte dell'utente. Ad esempio, i soggetti terzi che l'utente invita a collaborare con lui
							in qualità di "revisori" utilizzando le funzioni di collaborazione dei Servizi Box possono anche modificare i Contenuti condivisi dall'utente,
							caricare documenti e foto nei Contenuti condivisi dall'utente, condividere tali Contenuti all'esterno dei Servizi Box e fornire ad altri soggetti terzi
							i diritti a visualizzare i Contenuti condivisi dall'utente.
Applicazioni di terzi:
Box offre all'utente la possibilità di connettersi ad applicazioni o servizi di terzi, ad esempio tramite l'ecosistema di partner di applicazioni
							Box o Box OneCloud. Se l'utente sceglie di utilizzare uno di questi servizi o applicazioni di terzi, è possibile che Box condivida informazioni a
							suo riguardo, inclusi il nome utente e i Contenuti che l'utente ha scelto di utilizzare con questi servizi e applicazioni; inoltre, i soggetti terzi
							interessati possono contattare direttamente l'utente se necessario. La presente Informativa sulla privacy non si applica all'uso di tali servizi e
							applicazioni di terzi da parte dell'utente e Box non è responsabile delle modalità con cui i soggetti terzi interessati raccolgono,
							utilizzano e divulgano le informazioni o i Contenuti dell'utente. Box invita l'utente a leggere le informative sulla privacy dei terzi interessati
							prima di connettersi ad essi o utilizzare i loro servizi o applicazioni, per saperne di più sulle loro prassi relative alla privacy e al
							trattamento delle informazioni.
Conformità alle leggi:
Box può divulgare a un soggetto terzo le informazioni sull'utente nel caso in cui: (a) ritenga che la divulgazione sia ragionevolmente necessaria
							per osservare la conformità alle leggi, le normative, i procedimenti legali o le richieste governative applicabili (b) debba applicare i suoi
							contratti, le sue politiche e i suoi Termini del servizio, (c) debba proteggere la sicurezza o l'integrità dei Servizi Box, (d) debba proteggere
							Box, i suoi clienti o il pubblico da danni o attività illegali, oppure (e) debba rispondere a un'emergenza che in buona fede richieda a Box di
							divulgare informazioni per prevenire il decesso o il grave ferimento di una qualsivoglia persona.
Cessioni commerciali:
Box può divulgare a soggetti terzi le informazioni personali dell'utente nei seguenti casi:
o vendita, fusione o acquisizione parziale o totale di qualsivoglia attività o bene di Box, nel qual caso Box può divulgare i dati personali
						dell'utente al potenziale venditore, partner o acquirente di tali attività o beni; oppure
o acquisto di Box.com (UK) Limited e/o altre aziende del Gruppo (inclusa la nostra società madre ultima Box Inc.) o acquisto sostanziale di tutti i
						loro beni da parte di un soggetto terzo, nel qual caso i dati personali dei clienti detenuti da Box saranno uno dei beni che verranno ceduti.
.
Dati aggregati o anonimizzati:
Box può condividere con soggetti terzi anche informazioni aggregate o in forma anonima che non permettono di identificare direttamente l'utente.
Gruppo aziendale:
Box può divulgare le informazioni personali dell'utente a qualsiasi membro del suo Gruppo, ovvero a qualsiasi azienda che controlli Box, sia
							controllata da Box o sia controllata insieme a Box.
Funzioni di collaborazione e condivisione
I Servizi Box offrono funzioni di collaborazione o altri strumenti integrati che permettono all'utente di condividere i suoi Contenuti. Nell'ambito della
						natura collaborativa dei Servizi Box e in base alle autorizzazioni e ai permessi scelti dall'utente, l'uso di tali funzioni permette la condivisione dei
						Contenuti con le persone scelte dall'utente o con il pubblico. L'utente può decidere di modificare le impostazioni selezionate per un file o una
						cartella in qualsiasi momento, utilizzando il suo account. Per ulteriori informazioni su queste funzioni di collaborazione e condivisione, leggere le
						informazioni fornite su
success.box.com
.
Sicurezza
Per quanto nessun servizio possa essere considerato sicuro al cento per cento, Box adotta ogni ragionevole misura per proteggere le informazioni
						dell'utente da perdita, furto, uso improprio o accesso non autorizzato, divulgazione, modifica o distruzione. A tale scopo, ad esempio, Box crittografa i
						Contenuti dell'utente che vengono archiviati nei suoi centri dati. In più, le informazioni sensibili quali il numero di carta di credito e la password
						richieste dai Servizi Box sono protette da crittografia, ad esempio il protocollo SSL (Secured Socket Layer), quando vengono trasmesse su Internet.
I server in cui sono archiviate le informazioni personali si trovano all'interno di un ambiente controllato ad accesso limitato. Anche se Box adotta ogni
						ragionevole misura per salvaguardare le informazioni personali che raccoglie intenzionalmente dall'utente, nessun sistema di sicurezza è impenetrabile
						e, data la natura intrinseca di mezzo di comunicazione aperto e globale di Internet, Box non è in grado di garantire che tali informazioni trasmesse
						su Internet o archiviate nei suoi sistemi o altrimenti affidate alla sua tutela saranno assolutamente al riparo da intrusioni da parte di altri soggetti,
						ad esempio gli hacker. Analogamente, Box non è in grado di garantire che le informazioni personali raccolte in maniera passiva e consapevolmente
						incluse dall'utente nei documenti archiviati nei nostri sistemi vengano gestite ai livelli di protezione adeguati a soddisfare specifici requisiti o
						obblighi che l'utente possa avere in merito a tali informazioni.
L'utente può accedere alle informazioni sul suo account e sul nostro servizio solo tramite l'uso di un ID utente e di una password personali. Per
						proteggere la riservatezza delle informazioni personali, è necessario che l'utente tenga riservata la sua password e non la comunichi a nessuno.
						Qualora l'utente ritenga che la sua password sia stata utilizzata in modo improprio, è tenuto ad avvisare immediatamente Box. Inoltre si raccomanda
						all'utente di effettuare sempre la disconnessione e di chiudere il browser al termine di ogni sessione. Tenere presente che Box non richiederà mai
						all'utente di comunicare la sua password con una telefonata o un'e-mail non richieste dall'utente stesso.
Informativa sull'uso dei cookie
Per raccogliere informazioni e distinguere un utente specifico dagli altri utenti dei Servizi Box, Box si avvale di diverse tecnologie di tracciamento,
						quali cookie e Web beacon, che possono richiedere il salvataggio di cookie nel computer o nel dispositivo mobile dell'utente. Grazie a queste tecnologie,
						Box è in grado di offrire un'esperienza ottimale all'utente che accede e utilizza i suoi Servizi Box e di migliorare questi ultimi.
Cos'è un cookie?
I cookie sono piccoli file di dati che vengono archiviati nel browser o nel disco rigido del computer dell'utente dietro consenso di quest'ultimo. I cookie
						contengono informazioni che vengono trasferite nel disco rigido dell'utente.
Cos'è un Web beacon?
Un Web beacon (conosciuto anche come "pixel di tracciamento") è un'immagine elettronica, chiamata "gif," che può essere utilizzata nei Servizi
						Box o negli e-mail e permette a Box di inviare i cookie, contare le visite, misurare l'uso e l'efficacia delle campagne e stabilire se un e-mail è
						stato aperto e se ha generato delle azioni.
In che modo Box utilizza queste tecnologie?
Box si avvale di cookie e Web beacon per migliorare i Servizi Box e l'esperienza dell'utente, personalizzare l'esperienza e le preferenze di quest'ultimo e
						permettergli di accedere e utilizzare i Servizi Box senza dover reimmettere il suo ID e/o la sua password, capire quali aree e funzioni dei Servizi Box
						sono più popolari e contare le visite.
Quali cookie utilizza Box?
Di seguito è riportata una panoramica delle categorie di cookie presenti sul Sito di Box e una descrizione delle funzioni di tali cookie. L'utente
						è invitato a leggere periodicamente questa panoramica dal momento che può venire aggiornata di quando in quando:
Cookie funzionali
: i cookie funzionali sono quelli impostati da Box per fare in modo che il Sito funzioni secondo le aspettative dell'utente. Alcuni cookie sono necessari
						per permettere all'utente di muoversi nel Sito e utilizzare i Servizi. In assenza di questi cookie, Box non è in grado di fornire all'utente i Servizi
						Box da lui richiesti, ad esempio l'evasione di un ordine.
Box utilizza altri cookie per poter riconoscere e ricordare l'utente quando questi accede al Sito, in modo da utilizzare le impostazioni e le preferenze
						personali, ad esempio quelle riguardanti la lingua, il paese di provenienza o lo stato di accesso. Questi cookie aiutano Box a fornire all'utente i servizi
						che ha richiesto e non tengono traccia dell'attività svolta da quest'ultimo mentre visita siti Web diversi dal Sito di Box.
Come descritto di seguito, l'utente può decidere di disabilitare i cookie funzionali; in tal caso, tuttavia, è possibile che l'utente non sia
						più in grado di utilizzare il Sito o che questo non funzioni nel modo desiderato dall'utente.
Cookie prestazionali
: Box si avvale di strumenti analitici di terzi per capire il modo in cui l'utente utilizza il suo Sito. Questi strumenti analitici non forniscono a Box
						dati personali in grado di identificare l'utente, ma solo informazioni indicanti, ad esempio, in che modo l'utente è arrivato al Sito di Box, se ha
						già visitato il Sito in precedenza, quanto tempo ha trascorso sul Sito e quali pagine del Sito ha visitato. Possono anche fornire a Box informazioni
						generali finalizzate alla localizzazione dell'utente. Grazie a queste informazioni, Box è in grado di capire in che modo le persone utilizzano i
						Servizi Box, sapere che tipo di esperienza hanno quando visitano il Sito o utilizzano i Servizi Box e, di conseguenza, migliorare questa esperienza.
In che modo l'utente può gestire o rifiutare i cookie?
Per ulteriori informazioni sui cookie e su come è possibile disabilitarli, leggere la sezione "
Opzioni per l'utente
"
						riportata più avanti.
Opzioni per l'utente
Informazioni sull'account e loro conservazione
L'utente può aggiornare, correggere o eliminare le informazioni che lo riguardano in qualsiasi momento, collegandosi al suo account online e
						modificando le informazioni oppure inviando un'e-mail a Box all'indirizzo
support@box.com
. Box conserverà le
						informazioni personali dell'utente per il periodo necessario a raggiungere gli scopi descritti nella presente Informativa sulla privacy. Qualora l'utente
						desideri disattivare il suo account, è pregato di inviare un e-mail a Box all'indirizzo
support@box.com
, tenendo
						presente che Box potrebbe conservare alcune informazioni ai sensi della legge o per scopi commerciali legittimi. Inoltre, Box potrebbe conservare alcune
						copie archiviate o memorizzate su cache delle informazioni sull'utente per un determinato periodo di tempo.
Comunicati promozionali
L'utente ha diritto a "negare il consenso" a ricevere comunicazioni marketing da Box. Per non ricevere più e-mail promozionali (incluse le newsletter)
						da Box, è sufficiente seguire le istruzioni indicate in queste e-mail. L'utente può rifiutarsi di ricevere e-mail o altre comunicazioni
						promozionali da Box in qualsiasi momento, anche inviando all'indirizzo
support@box.com
un'e-mail indicante questa
						specifica richiesta. Dopo che l'utente avrà espresso questo rifiuto, Box potrà comunque continuare a inviargli comunicazioni non promozionali,
						quali avvisi di sicurezza o notifiche relative all'accesso o all'uso dei Servizi Box o altre notifiche relative all'account online o alle relazioni
						commerciali in corso con l'utente.
Cookie/Tecnologie di tracciamento
La maggior parte dei browser Web, come Internet Explorer, FireFox e Safari, è automaticamente impostata per accettare i cookie. Qualora l'utente non
						desideri ricevere cookie o altre tecnologie di tracciamento, può impostare il suo browser in modo che rimuova o rifiuti i cookie o richieda una
						conferma prima di accettarli. L'utente può anche eliminare i cookie già impostati. Le istruzioni per farlo sono disponibili nella funzione di
						"Guida" del browser utilizzato. In alternativa, l'utente può visitare il sito
www.aboutcookie.org
, che
						contiene informazioni esaustive su come eseguire questa operazione in diversi browser desktop. Se l'utente decide di rimuovere o rifiutare i cookie, deve
						tenere presente che tale operazione potrebbe avere un impatto sulla disponibilità o sulla funzionalità dei Servizi Box.
Diritti dell'utente
L'utente ha i seguenti diritti:
· il diritto di richiedere in qualsiasi momento a Box le copie delle informazioni personali che Box conserva a suo riguardo, dietro pagamento di una
						commissione prevista dalla legge;
· il diritto di chiedere a Box di aggiornare e correggere gratuitamente le informazioni non più aggiornate o errate che Box conserva a suo
						riguardo; e
il diritto di rifiutare qualsivoglia comunicazione marketing che Box (o un soggetto terzo a cui Box ha divulgato le informazioni personali dell'utente con
						il consenso di quest'ultimo) potrebbero inviargli. Per ulteriori informazioni, leggere la sezione "
Opzioni dell'utente
" riporta
						più sopra.
Link a siti Web di terzi
I Servizi Box possono contenere link a siti di terzi. Se l'utente fa clic su uno di questi link per accedere a un sito Web di terzi dal Sito Web di Box,
						tale attività e l'uso del sito Web di terzi sono soggetti alle politiche di tale sito Web e non a quelle del Sito di Box. L'utente è invitato a
						visitare tali siti Web e a leggere le informative sulla privacy e le politiche relative agli utenti di tali siti.
Politica Box relativa ai minori di 13 anni
I Servizi Box non sono rivolti ai minori di 13 anni. Box non raccoglie intenzionalmente le informazioni personali dei minori di 13 anni. Qualora l'utente
					venisse a conoscenza del fatto che un minore di 13 anni ha fornito a Box informazioni personali, è pregato di contattare Box all'indirizzo
support@box.com
. Qualora Box venga a conoscenza del fatto che un minore di 13 anni ha fornito informazioni personali a
						Box, intraprenderà tutte le azioni necessarie a eliminare tali informazioni.
Per contattare Box
Tutte le domande, i commenti e le richieste riguardanti la presente Informativa sulla privacy vanno indirizzate a
support@box.com
.
►
España - Españo
Box.com (UK) Ltd ("
Box", "nosotros" o "nuestro/a")
respetamos los derechos de privacidad de los usuarios y reconocemos la importancia de
						proteger y gestionar la información que recopilamos sobre usted de acuerdo con las leyes y las prácticas recomendadas.
Esta Política de privacidad y cookies para plataformas móviles y en línea, en combinación con nuestras
Condiciones de uso de los
						servicios
y todos los demás documentos a los que se haga
						referencia a continuación ("
Política de privacidad
") le informa a usted ("
usted
" o "
su
") sobre
						el modo en que Box recopila, utiliza, almacena y revela su información (ya sean datos personales o confidenciales), además de las decisiones
						específicas que puede tomar acerca de su información.
Esta Política de privacidad se aplica a la información que recopilamos cuando accede o utiliza nuestros sitios web en línea o móviles
						disponibles en www.Box.com ("
Sitio
"), productos, servicios o aplicaciones (en conjunto, "
Servicios de Box
"), o cuando
						interactúa con nosotros de alguna otra forma.
Le rogamos que lea atentamente lo siguiente para conocer nuestros puntos de vista y prácticas en relación con sus datos personales y el modo
							en que los trataremos.
De acuerdo con la Ley de protección de datos de 1998 ("
la Ley
"), la entidad que controla los datos es Box.com (UK) Limited, con sede
						en 64 North Row, 2nd floor, London W1K 7LL, Reino Unido.
Tenga en cuenta que Box no será siempre la entidad que controle los datos en todos los aspectos de los servicios. De algunos de los datos personales
						que se cargan o procesan como parte de los Servicios de Box se encargará la entidad de control de datos final. Por ejemplo, los empleados o agentes
						que actúen en su nombre. Estos datos personales pueden ser los que están contenidos en archivos, documentos o imágenes que se comparten o se
						utilizan en colaboraciones en el Servicio de Box. En tales circunstancias, Box es el procesador de datos que actúa en nombre de la entidad de control
						de datos final y los Servicios de Box se implementan en nombre de la entidad de control de datos, como la empresa para la que trabaja o una universidad (un
						"
usuario empresarial
"). La entidad de control de datos ha firmado con nosotros un acuerdo empresarial independiente en virtud del cual
						actuamos en su nombre utilizando métodos organizativos y técnicos para proteger los datos personales de los que es responsable.
Por tanto, si usted es un Usuario empresarial, los términos de ese contrato de la organización para utilizar los Servicios de Box puede limitar
						nuestra recopilación o uso de su información más de lo que se estipula en esta Política de privacidad. Por consiguiente, le rogamos que
						lea esas condiciones junto con esta Política de privacidad.
En esta Política de privacidad, los términos "datos personales" y "datos personales confidenciales" tendrán el mismo significado que se les
						da en la Ley.
Cambios en esta Política
Esta Política de privacidad puede sufrir cambios de vez en cuando. Si realizamos algún cambio, se lo notificaremos modificando la fecha de
						"Última modificación" en la parte superior de esta Política de privacidad y, según sea apropiado, podremos enviarle un aviso adicional
						(por ejemplo, añadiendo un comunicado en la página inicial o enviándole una notificación por correo electrónico). Si se produce
						algún cambio importante en esta Política de privacidad, se lo notificaremos más directamente por correo electrónico. Por tanto, le
						animamos a que lea nuestra Política de privacidad siempre que acceda a los Servicios de Box para mantenerse informado acerca de nuestras
						prácticas sobre la información y las formas en que puede ayudarnos a proteger su privacidad.
Si no está de acuerdo con algún cambio en esta Política de privacidad y no desea que su información se someta a la nueva
							Política de privacidad modificada, tendrá que desactivar su cuenta y dejar de utilizar los Servicios de Box.
Si tiene alguna duda acerca de esta Política de privacidad o la información que tenemos sobre usted, póngase en contacto con nosotros en
la
						sección Contacto más
abajo.
Información recopilada
Recopilamos diversa información para poder ofrecer el Servicio de Box, mejorar nuestro Sitio y mejorar la experiencia que tienen los usuarios de
						nuestros servicios (por ejemplo, al determinar la ubicación de su Proveedor de servicios de Internet ("
ISP
") podemos ofrecerle una
						versión localizada de nuestro Sitio (por ejemplo, permitiendo modificaciones en el contacto, el idioma y la moneda). Para obtener más
					información acerca de los fines para los que utilizamos su información, consulte
la sección Uso de la información
más adelante.
Recopilamos la siguiente información (que puede incluir datos personales y/o datos personales confidenciales):
Información que usted nos proporciona.
Recopilamos la información que nos proporciona directamente a nosotros cuando utiliza el Sitio y cuando se registra y utiliza los Servicios de Box.
						Ejemplos:
· Recopilamos información cuando registra una cuenta de Box, cuando crea o modifica su perfil y la cuenta en línea, cuando accede y utiliza
						los Servicios de Box (incluidas, entre otras, la carga, descarga, colaboración o compartición de archivos u otra información), cuando
						participa en alguna función interactiva de los Servicios de Box, cuando participa en una encuesta, un concurso, una promoción, un sorteo, una
						actividad o un evento, cuando realiza una compra, solicita un trabajo, solicita ayuda al servicio de atención al cliente, se comunica con nosotros a
						través de los sitios de redes sociales de terceros o se comunica con nosotros de alguna otra forma.
· El tipo de información que podemos recopilar directamente de usted es su nombre, nombre de usuario, dirección de correo electrónico,
						dirección postal, número de teléfono, información sobre sus preferencias de almacenamiento de datos, el nombre de su empresa, su cargo,
						información sobre transacciones (incluidos los servicios adquiridos o a los que está suscrito, y la dirección de facturación), así
						como cualquier dato de contacto u otra información que desee proporcionarnos. También almacenamos los archivos u otra información que cargue
						o proporcione en los Servicios de Box ("
Contenido
").
· Si va a proporcionar información (incluidos datos personales) sobre otra persona, tiene que confirmar que le ha autorizado a actuar en su
						nombre y permite el procesamiento de su información personal, y que usted le ha informado de nuestra identidad y la finalidad (tal y como se establece
						en esta Política de privacidad) para la cual se van a procesar sus datos personales.
Información que recopilamos automáticamente.
Cuando accede a los Servicios de Box o los utiliza, podemos recopilar automáticamente información sobre usted, lo que incluye:
Información de uso:
supervisamos la actividad del usuario en conexión con los Servicios de Box y podemos recopilar información acerca de las aplicaciones y las
							funciones que utiliza, los sitios web que visita, los tamaños y los nombres de los archivos o carpetas que carga, descarga, comparte o abre
							mientras utiliza los Servicios de Box, el Contenido al que accede y cualquier acción que realice en relación con el acceso y el uso del
							Contenido en los Servicios de Box.
Información de registro:
registramos información sobre usted cuando accede a los Servicios de Box y los utiliza, incluida la dirección de su protocolo de Internet ("
IP
"), los tiempos de acceso, el tipo de navegador y el idioma, el ISP, las páginas web que visita, el Contenido que utiliza y la
							URL de la página web que ha visitado antes de navegar a los Servicios de Box.
Información del dispositivo:
si accede a los Servicios de Box desde un dispositivo móvil, recopilamos información acerca del dispositivo, incluido el modelo de hardware,
							el sistema operativo y la versión, los identificadores de dispositivo únicos, la información de la red móvil (si lo permite la red
							móvil) o la información de la plataforma (si lo permite el tipo de plataforma específico).
Información
que recopilan las cookies y otras tecnologías de seguimiento:
utilizamos diversas tecnologías de seguimiento, como cookies y balizas web, para recopilar información y distinguirle de otros usuarios de
							nuestro Sitio, y para ello podremos guardar las cookies en su ordenador o dispositivo móvil. Esto nos ayuda a ofrecerle una buena experiencia al
							navegar y utilizar nuestros Servicios de Box y también nos permite mejorar dichos servicios. Para obtener más información acerca de
							cómo utilizamos las cookies y otras tecnologías de seguimiento, consulte
la sección Cookies
.
Información que recopilamos de otras fuentes.
También podremos obtener información de terceros y combinarla con la información que recopilamos a través de los Servicios de Box. Por
						ejemplo, es posible que tengamos acceso a determinada información de un servicio de redes sociales de un tercero si crea una cuenta en línea o
						inicia sesión en ella a través del servicio, o nos proporciona acceso a la información desde el servicio. Cualquier acceso que tengamos a
						dicha información desde un servicio de redes sociales de terceros será de acuerdo con los procedimientos de autorización que determine dicho
						servicio.
Uso de la información
Podremos utilizar la información (que puede incluir datos personales) que recopilamos sobre usted para diversos fines, entre los que se incluyen:
Proporcionar, hacer funcionar, mantener y mejorar los Servicios de Box;
· Permitirle acceder y utilizar los Servicios de Box, incluida la carga, la descarga, la colaboración, y la compartición de Contenido, y el
						envío de correos electrónicos en su nombre;
· Enviarle avisos técnicos, actualizaciones, alertas de seguridad, y mensajes de soporte y administrativos;
· Proporcionarle y ofrecerle los servicios y las funciones que ha solicitado, procesar y completar transacciones, y enviarle información
						relacionada, incluidas confirmaciones de compra y facturas;
Responder a sus comentarios, preguntas y solicitudes, y ofrecer un servicio de soporte al cliente;
· Comunicarnos con usted, si está de acuerdo o si lo permite la ley, con fines de marketing, lo que incluye informarle periódicamente sobre
						servicios, funciones, encuestas, boletines, ofertas, promociones, concursos y eventos, y ofrecerle otras noticias o información acerca de Box y
						nuestros socios seleccionados; Solo compartimos sus datos personales con fines de marketing y/o para enviarle material promocional si ha dado su permiso
						para ello. Para obtener más información acerca de cómo cambiar las preferencias y anular su suscripción al material promocional (ya
					sean boletines, mensajes de marketing y notificaciones de correo electrónico),
consulte la sección Sus opciones más
abajo.
Procesar la participación en concursos y sorteos, y entregar los premios;
Supervisar y analizar tendencias, usos y actividades en relación con los Servicios de Box y con fines de marketing y publicidad;
Investigar e impedir transacciones fraudulentas, el acceso no autorizado a los Servicios de Box y otras actividades ilegales;
Personalizar y mejorar los Servicios de Box, y proporcionar contenido, funciones y/o publicidad que se corresponda con sus intereses y preferencias, o
							personalizar de otro modo su experiencia en los Servicios de Box;
Enlazar o combinar esa información con otra que recibamos de terceros para poder entender sus necesidades y ofrecerle un servicio mejor;
Permitirle comunicarse, colaborar y compartir archivos con los usuarios que usted designe; y
Para otras finalidades que le notificaremos.
Lugar de almacenamiento de su información
Box tiene su sede en el Reino Unido, pero podremos almacenar y procesar la información personal y el contenido en los Estados Unidos y en otros
						países a través de nuestra empresa del grupo afiliada de EE. UU., Box, Inc. Al acceder o utilizar los Servicios de Box o al proporcionarnos
						información de otra forma, está aceptando el procesamiento y la transferencia de información en y a EE. UU. (en donde Box Inc. y sus agentes
						la almacenan en nuestro nombre) y a otros países y territorios, en los que podría haber leyes sobre privacidad diferentes a las de su país
						de residencia.
Box Inc. cumple los principios de privacidad de Safe Harbor del Departamento de Comercio de EE. UU. en relación con la recopilación, el uso y la
						conservación de información personal de la Unión Europea y los principios de privacidad Swiss Safe Harbor del Departamento de Comercio de
						EE. UU. en relación con la recopilación, el uso y la conservación de información personal de Suiza. Las certificaciones Safe Harbor de
					Box Inc. se pueden consultar en:
http://safeharbor.export.gov/companyinfo.aspx?id=15927
. Para obtener más
					información acerca de los Principios Safe Harbor, visite el sitio web del Departamento de Comercio de EE. UU. en
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
Si tiene alguna duda acerca de esta Política de privacidad, debe ponerse en contacto con nosotros en
support@box.com
.
Compartición y revelación de información
No compartiremos su información personal ni ningún Contenido con terceros, excepto en la forma que se describe en esta Política de
						privacidad o en relación con los Servicios de Box. Por ejemplo, podremos compartir su información personal con:
Distribuidores, consultores y otros proveedores de servicios:
podremos compartir su información con otros distribuidores, consultores y proveedores de servicios que trabajen en nuestro nombre y necesiten
							acceder a su información para realizar su trabajo.
Cuenta corporativa:
si usted es un usuario registrado de Box y el dominio de la dirección de correo electrónico principal asociada a su cuenta de Box es
							propiedad de su empresa y se le ha asignado como empleado de esa organización, y dicha organización desea establecer una cuenta corporativa
							de Box, es posible que determinada información relativa al uso pasado de su cuenta sea accesible al administrador de esa organización, lo que
							incluye su dirección de correo electrónico.
Con su consentimiento:
podremos compartir su información con su consentimiento; por ejemplo, cuando decida utilizar las funciones de colaboración de los Servicios
							de Box que, por su propia naturaleza, permiten la compartición con los terceros de su elección. Su nombre, dirección de correo
							electrónico, información de su perfil y cuenta en línea (incluida su foto) y cualquier Contenido que decida compartir se
							compartirán con dichos terceros, quienes podrán comunicarse con usted (por ejemplo, publicando comentarios o mediante correo
							electrónico) en relación con el uso que usted realice de las funciones de colaboración de los Servicios de Box. Por ejemplo, los
							terceros que usted invite a colaborar con usted como "Editores" utilizando las funciones de colaboración de los Servicios de Box también
							podrán modificar el Contenido que ha compartido, cargar documentos y fotos en el Contenido que ha compartido, compartir dicho Contenido fuera de
							los Servicios de Box, y proporcionar a otros terceros los derechos para ver el Contenido que ha compartido.
Aplicaciones de terceros:
Box le ofrece la oportunidad de conectarse con aplicaciones o servicios de terceros, como a través de Box OneCloud o el ecosistema de socios de
							aplicaciones de Box. Si decide utilizar alguna de esas aplicaciones o servicios de terceros, podremos compartir información sobre usted, lo que
							incluye su nombre de usuario y cualquier Contenido que decida utilizar en relación con esas aplicaciones y servicios, y dichos terceros
							podrán ponerse en contacto con usted directamente si es necesario. Esta Política de privacidad no se aplica al uso que haga de esas
							aplicaciones y servicios de terceros, y no somos responsables del modo en que dichos terceros recopilan, utilizan y revelan su información y
							Contenido. Le recomendamos que lea las políticas de privacidad de esos terceros antes de conectarse o utilizar sus aplicaciones o servicios para
							obtener más información acerca de sus prácticas sobre la información y la privacidad.
Cumplimiento de las leyes:
podremos revelar su información a un tercero (a) si creemos que la revelación de dicha información es razonablemente necesaria para
							cumplir cualquier ley, normativa, proceso legal o solicitud gubernamental que sea aplicable, (b) para cumplir nuestros acuerdos, políticas y
							Condiciones de uso de los servicios, (c) para proteger la seguridad o la integridad de los Servicios de Box, (d) para proteger Box, a nuestros clientes
							o al público de actividades perjudiciales o ilegales, o (e) para responder a una emergencia que creamos, de buena fe, que nos obliga a revelar la
							información para ayudar a evitar lesiones graves o mortales a cualquier persona.
Transferencias comerciales:
podremos revelar su información personal a terceros:
o En caso de que vendamos, nos fusionemos o compremos la totalidad o una parte sustancial de una empresa o activos, podremos revelar su información
						personal al posible vendedor, socio de la fusión o comprador de dicha empresa o activos; o
o Si Box.com (UK) Limited y/o otras empresas del grupo (incluida nuestra empresa matriz Box Inc.) o prácticamente todos sus activos son adquiridos por
						un tercero, en cuyo caso se transferirán los datos personales que esta empresa posea sobre sus clientes.
.
Datos agregados o anónimos:
también podremos compartir con terceros información agregada o anónima que no le identifique directamente.
Nuestro grupo:
podremos revelar su información personal a cualquier miembro de nuestro grupo, lo que significa cualquier empresa que controle a Box, sea
							controlada por Box o esté bajo el control común de Box.
Colaboración y compartición de funciones
Los Servicios de Box disponen de funciones de colaboración u otras herramientas integradas que le permiten compartir su Contenido a través de los
						Servicios de Box. Dada la naturaleza colaborativa de los Servicios de Box y en función de los permisos y la configuración que elija, el uso de
						dichas funciones le permite compartir el Contenido con personas con las que desee colaborar o con el público. Puede optar por cambiar cuando lo desee
						la configuración de un archivo o carpeta a través de su cuenta. Para obtener más información acerca de dichas funciones de
					colaboración y compartición, le aconsejamos que lea la información que se proporciona en
success.box.com
.
Seguridad
Aunque no hay ningún servicio que sea completamente seguro, Box toma medidas razonables para proteger la información sobre usted de cualquier
						pérdida, robo, uso indebido y acceso no autorizado, revelación, modificación y destrucción. Por ejemplo, ciframos el Contenido que
						está almacenado en nuestros centros de datos. Asimismo, la información confidencial (por ejemplo, el número de la tarjeta de crédito y
						la contraseña) que le solicitamos en los Servicios de Box se protege mediante cifrado (por ejemplo, el protocolo SSL, Secured Socket Layer) durante la
						transmisión por Internet.
Los servidores en los que se almacena la información personal se mantienen en un entorno controlado, cuyo acceso es limitado. Aunque tomamos medidas
						razonables para proteger la información personal que recopilamos directamente de usted, no hay ningún sistema de seguridad que sea infranqueable
						y, dada la naturaleza inherente de Internet como vehículo de comunicación abierto y global, no podemos garantizar que esa información,
						durante su transmisión a través de Internet o mientras está almacenada en nuestros sistemas o a nuestro cuidado, estará absolutamente
						protegida de la intrusión de otras personas (por ejemplo, piratas informáticos). Tampoco podemos garantizar que la información personal que
						se haya recopilado de manera pasiva y que opte por incluir en los documentos que almacene en nuestros sistemas se mantendrá con los niveles de
						protección adecuados para satisfacer determinadas necesidades u obligaciones que pudiera tener en relación con ella.
Solo puede acceder a la información de su cuenta y a nuestro servicio por medio de un ID de usuario y una contraseña individuales. Para proteger
						la confidencialidad de la información personal, debe mantener la confidencialidad de su contraseña y no revelarla a ninguna otra persona.
						Avísenos inmediatamente si cree que alguien ha utilizado su contraseña de forma indebida. Asimismo, cierre siempre la sesión y el navegador
						cuando finalice la sesión. Tenga en cuenta que nosotros nunca le pediremos que revele su contraseña mediante una llamada de teléfono o un
						mensaje de correo electrónico no solicitados.
Política sobre cookies
Utilizamos diversas tecnologías de seguimiento, como cookies y balizas web, para recopilar información y distinguirle de otros usuarios de los
						Servicios de Box, y para ello podremos guardar las cookies en su ordenador o dispositivo móvil. Esto nos ayuda a ofrecerle una buena experiencia al
						navegar y utilizar nuestros Servicios de Box y también nos permite mejorar dichos servicios.
¿Qué es una cookie?
Las cookies son pequeños archivos de datos que se guardan en su navegador o en el disco duro de su ordenador, si usted lo permite. Las cookies
						contienen información que se transfiere al disco duro.
¿Qué es una baliza web?
Una baliza web (también conocida como "píxeles de seguimiento") es una imagen electrónica, también denominada "gif", que se puede
						utilizar en los Servicios de Box o en los mensajes de correo electrónico para ayudarnos a entregar cookies, contar las visitas, conocer el uso y la
						eficacia de la campaña, y determinar si se ha abierto un mensaje de correo electrónico y las acciones que se han realizado con él.
¿Cómo utilizamos estas tecnologías?
Las cookies y balizas web nos ayudan a mejorar los Servicios de Box y su experiencia, personalizar su experiencia y sus preferencias, permitirle acceder y
						utilizar los Servicios de Box sin tener que volver a introducir el ID y/o contraseña de miembro, conocer las áreas y funciones de los Servicios
						de Box que son más populares y contar las visitas.
¿Qué cookies utilizamos?
A continuación, le ofrecemos un resumen de las categorías de cookies que hay en nuestro Sitio y una descripción de lo que hacen.
						Visítenos periódicamente, ya que podemos actualizar esta información de vez en cuando:
Cookies funcionales
: las cookies funcionales son las que Box define para que el Sitio funcione de la forma esperada. Algunas cookies son necesarias para poder moverse por
						nuestro Sitio y utilizar los Servicios. Sin estas cookies, no podemos prestar los Servicios de Box que usted nos solicita (por ejemplo, el procesamiento de
						los pedidos).
Utilizamos otras cookies para poder reconocerle y recordarle cuando inicia la sesión en el Sitio con el objeto de poder recordar su configuración
						y preferencias (por ejemplo, su idioma y región, o el estado de inicio de sesión). Estas cookies también nos ayudan a prestar los servicios
						que usted nos solicita. Estas cookies no realizan un seguimiento de su actividad de navegación en sitios web que no sean de Box.
Tal y como se ha explicado anteriormente, puede desactivar cualquiera de estas cookies funcionales, pero si lo hace, es posible que algunas de las
						funciones del Sitio no estén disponibles para usted o no funcionen como desea.
Cookies de rendimiento
: utilizamos herramientas de análisis de terceros para conocer el uso que hace de nuestro Sitio. Dichas herramientas no le proporcionan a Box
						ningún dato personal que pueda identificarle. Nos indican cosas como la forma en que ha llegado al Sitio de Box, si nos ha visitado anteriormente,
						cuánto tiempo permanece en el Sitio y qué páginas del Sitio ha visitado. También nos proporcionan información general sobre el
						lugar del mundo en el que se encuentra un usuario. Esta información nos ayuda a saber la forma en que la gente utiliza los Servicios de Box y nos
						proporciona información acerca del tipo de experiencia que la gente tiene en nuestro Sitio y a través de los Servicios de Box, todo lo cual nos
						ayuda a mejorar aún más la experiencia con Box.
¿Cómo gestiono o rechazo las cookies?
Para obtener más información acerca de las cookies y cómo desactivarlas, consulte la sección "
"Sus opciones
" a continuación.
Sus opciones
Información de la cuenta y conservación.
Para actualizar, corregir o suprimir la información sobre usted en cualquier momento, inicie la sesión en su cuenta en línea y
						modifíquela o envíenos un mensaje de correo electrónico a
support@box.com
. Conservaremos su
						información personal durante el periodo necesario para cumplir los objetivos descritos en esta Política de privacidad. Si desea desactivar su
						cuenta, envíenos un mensaje de correo electrónico a
support@box.com
, pero tenga en cuenta que podremos
						conservar determinada información según lo requiera la ley o para fines comerciales legítimos. También es posible que conservemos
						copias de información sobre usted en caché o archivadas durante un periodo de tiempo determinado.
Comunicaciones promocionales.
Puede anular la recepción de comunicaciones de marketing de Box. Para dejar de recibir mensajes de correo electrónico promocionales (incluidos
						los boletines), siga las instrucciones que se proporcionan en esos mensajes de correo electrónico. También puede anular la recepción de
					mensajes de correo electrónico y otras comunicaciones promocionales en cualquier momento enviándonos un mensaje a
support@box.com
con su solicitud específica. Aunque la anule, podremos seguir enviándole mensajes no
						promocionales, como alertas y avisos de seguridad relacionados con su acceso o uso de los Servicios de Box, o con su cuenta en línea o nuestras
						relaciones comerciales.
Cookies/tecnologías de seguimiento.
La mayoría de los navegadores web (por ejemplo, Internet Explorer, FireFox y Safari) están configurados de manera predeterminada para aceptar las
						cookies automáticamente. Si no desea recibir cookies ni otra tecnología de seguimiento, normalmente puede configurar el navegador para que
						elimine o rechace las cookies, o para que le avise antes de aceptar una cookie. También puede suprimir las cookies que ya se han definido. En la
					función de ayuda de su navegador debería encontrar las instrucciones para hacerlo. De forma alternativa, puede visitar
www.aboutcookies.org
, que contiene información completa acerca de cómo hacer esto en una amplia
						variedad de navegadores de escritorio. Tenga en cuenta que, si decide eliminar o rechazar las cookies, esto podría afectar a la disponibilidad o la
						funcionalidad de los Servicios de Box.
Sus derechos
Tiene los siguientes derechos:
· el derecho de pedirnos que le proporcionemos copias de la información que mantenemos sobre usted en cualquier momento, sujeto a una tarifa que
						especifica la ley;
· el derecho de pedirnos que actualicemos y corrijamos cualquier información personal desactualizada o incorrecta que tengamos sobre usted de
						manera gratuita; y
el derecho de anular la recepción de mensajes de marketing que podamos enviarle nosotros (o cualquier tercero al que le hayamos revelado su
						información personal con su consentimiento). Consulte la sección "
Sus opciones
" más arriba para obtener
						más información.
Vínculos a sitios web de terceros
En los Servicios de Box, colocamos vínculos. Al hacer clic en un vínculo a un sitio web de un tercero desde nuestro sitio web, su actividad y el
						uso del sitio web vinculado se rigen por las políticas de ese sitio web, no por las de Box. Le recomendamos que visite sus sitios web y que lea sus
						políticas de privacidad y de usuario.
Nuestra política en relación con los niños
Los Servicios de Box no están dirigidos a menores de 13 años. No recopilamos conscientemente información personal de menores de 13
					años. Si descubre que un menor nos ha proporcionado información personal, póngase en contacto con nosotros en
support@box.com
. Si descubrimos que un menor de 13 años nos ha proporcionado información personal, tomaremos
						medidas para eliminar dicha información.
Contacto
Cualquier pregunta, comentario y solicitud en relación con esta Política de privacidad se deberá dirigir a
support@box.com
.
►
Deutschland - Deutsch
Box.com (UK) Ltd („
Box", „wir", „uns" oder „unser/unsere")
respektieren die Datenschutzrechte der Benutzer und
						wissen um die Bedeutung des Schutzes und des Umgangs mit von Ihnen gesammelten Daten in Übereinstimmung mit den gesetzlichen Bestimmungen und
						bewährten Praktiken.
In Verbindung mit unseren
Nutzungsbedingungen
und allen weiteren nachstehend aufgeführten
					Dokumenten („
Datenschutzerklärung
") erläutert Ihnen („
Sie
" oder „
Ihr/Ihre/Ihnen
") diese Datenschutzerklärung und Cookie-Richtlinie, wie Ihre Informationen (einschließlich persönlicher
						Daten und/oder sensibler personenbezogener Daten) von Box gesammelt, gespeichert und weitergegeben werden. Des Weiteren wird dargelegt, welche spezifischen
						Auswahlmöglichkeiten Sie hinsichtlich Ihrer Informationen haben.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für Informationen, die von uns erhoben werden, wenn Sie unsere mobilen oder Online-Websites, verfügbar unter
						www.Box.com („
Website
"), Produkte, Dienste oder Anwendungen (zusammengefasst die „
Box-Dienste
") nutzen bzw.
						darauf zugreifen oder wenn Sie auf sonstige Weise mit uns interagieren.
Bitte lesen Sie die folgenden Bestimmungen sorgfältig durch, um unsere Auffassungen und Praktiken im Hinblick auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
							sowie unsere Handhabung derselben zu verstehen.
Im Sinne des Data Protection Act 1998 („
das Gesetz
") liegt die Verantwortung für die Daten bei Box.com (UK) Limited, 64 North Row, 2nd floor, London W1K 7LL, Vereinigtes Königreich.
Beachten Sie bitte, dass Box nicht immer die Daten-Verantwortung für alle Aspekte der Dienste trägt. Einige der personenbezogenen Daten, die als
						Teil der Box-Dienste hochgeladen oder verarbeitet werden, werden vom endgültigen Daten-Verantwortlichen hochgeladen. Dies geschieht beispielsweise
						durch Angestellte oder andere Personen und Stellen, die im Auftrag des Verantwortlichen handeln. Dies kann personenbezogene Daten in Dateien, Dokumenten
						oder Bildern umfassen, die bei der Nutzung der Box-Dienste freigegeben werden oder an denen gemeinsam gearbeitet wird. Unter diesen Umständen ist Box
						der Daten-Verarbeiter, der im Auftrag des endgültigen Daten-Verantwortlichen handelt, und die Box-Dienste werden im Auftrag des endgültigen
						Daten-Verantwortlichen eingesetzt (wie bei Ihrem Arbeitgeber oder einer Universität (ein „
Geschäftsnutzer
")). Dieser
						Daten-Verantwortliche hat mit uns eine separate Unternehmensvereinbarung geschlossen, auf deren Grundlage wir in dessen Auftrag handeln und
						organisatorische sowie technische Methoden verwenden, um die personenbezogenen Daten, die in dessen Verantwortung liegen, zu sichern und zu schützen.
Falls Sie ein Geschäftsnutzer sind, könnten die Bedingungen des Vertrags der jeweiligen Organisation für die Box-Dienste deshalb unsere
						Erhebung und Verwendung Ihrer Informationen in größerem Maße einschränken als in der hier vorliegenden Datenschutzerklärung
						beschrieben. Aus diesem Grund sollten Sie die entsprechenden Bedingungen in Verbindung mit der vorliegenden Datenschutzerklärung lesen.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben die Bezeichnungen persönliche Daten und sensible personenbezogene Daten die gleiche Bedeutung, so wie es
						auch im Gesetz vorgesehen ist.
Änderungen der Datenschutzerklärung
Wir können diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit ändern. Falls wir Änderungen durchführen, werden wir Sie darüber
						informieren, indem wir das Datum von „Zuletzt aktualisiert" am Anfang der Datenschutzerklärung korrigieren und Sie ggf. zusätzlich
						benachrichtigen (z. B. Veröffentlichung einer Erklärung auf unserer Homepage oder eine Mitteilung per E-Mail an Sie). Wenn wesentliche
						Änderungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung durchgeführt werden, werden wir Sie direkt per E-Mail benachrichtigen. Wir empfehlen Ihnen deshalb
						bei jedem Zugriff auf die Box-Dienste unsere Datenschutzerklärung zu überprüfen. So sind Sie über unsere Informationspraktiken und
						über die Maßnahmen, die Sie selbst zum Schutz Ihrer privaten Daten durchführen können, stets informiert.
Falls Sie mit Änderungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung nicht einverstanden sind und Sie nicht möchten, dass Ihre Informationen der
							geänderten Datenschutzerklärung unterliegen, müssen Sie eine Deaktivierung bei uns durchführen und die Nutzung der Box-Dienste
							beenden.
Sollten Sie Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder zu Ihren personenbezogenen Daten bei uns haben, dann wenden Sie sich bitte an uns wie
						beschrieben im Abschnitt unten „
Kontaktaufnahme
".
Erhobene Informationen
Wir erheben verschiedene Informationen, die uns ermöglichen, den Box-Dienst bereitzustellen, unsere Website zu verbessern und die Kundenzufriedenheit
					mit unseren Diensten zu steigern. Indem wir zum Beispiel den Standort Ihres Internetdienstanbieters (Internet Service Provider) („
ISP
") bestimmen, können wir eine lokalisierte Version unserer Website zur Verfügung stellen (z. B. für Kontaktaufnahme,
						Sprache und Währungsvariante). Für weitere Informationen zum Zweck der Verwendung Ihrer Daten bei uns lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt unten
						„
Nutzung der Informationen
".
Wir sammeln die folgenden Informationen (diese können auch persönliche Daten und/oder sensible personenbezogene Daten umfassen):
Informationen, die Sie uns übermitteln.
Wir sammeln Informationen, die Sie uns direkt übermitteln, wenn Sie die Website nutzen und sich für die Box-Dienste registrieren und diese
						verwenden. Beispiele hierfür sind u. a.:
· Wir erheben Daten, wenn Sie sich bei Box für ein Konto registrieren, Ihr Profil und Online-Konto anlegen oder ändern, auf die Box-Dienste
						zugreifen bzw. sie nutzen (einschließlich, aber nicht beschränkt auf das Hochladen, Herunterladen, die Zusammenarbeit an oder die Freigabe von
						Dateien oder anderen Informationen), an interaktiven Funktionsangeboten der Box-Dienste teilnehmen, an einer Umfrage, einem Wettbewerb, einer
						Werbemaßnahme, einem Gewinnspiel, einer Aktivität oder Veranstaltung teilnehmen, einen Kauf tätigen, sich für eine Stelle bewerben,
						eine Anfrage an den Kunden-Support stellen, mit uns über Drittparteien wie Websites sozialer Medien oder auf sonstige Weise mit uns kommunizieren.
· Zu den Informationsarten, die wir direkt von Ihnen erheben können, gehören Ihr Name, Benutzername, E-Mail-Adresse, Postanschrift,
						Telefonnummer, Informationen über Ihre Präferenzen der Datenspeicherung, Name des Arbeitgebers, Berufsbezeichnung, Daten im Zusammenhang mit
						Transaktionen (einschließlich erworbene oder abonnierte Dienste sowie Rechnungsadresse) und ebenfalls jedwede Kontaktinformation oder sonstige
						Information, die Sie bereitstellen wollen. Wir speichern auch die Dateien oder sonstigen Daten, die Sie hochladen oder den Box-Diensten zur Verfügung
						stellen („
Inhalt
").
· Falls Sie Informationen über eine andere Person bereitstellen (einschließlich persönlicher Daten), bestätigen Sie, dass diese
						Personen Sie benannt haben, in ihrem Auftrag zu handeln, dass sie der Verarbeitung ihrer persönlichen Daten zustimmen und dass Sie diese Personen
						über unsere Identität und die Zwecke (wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung festgelegt) informiert haben, zu denen ihre persönlichen Daten
						verarbeitet werden.
Informationen, die wir automatisch erheben.
Wenn Sie auf die Box-Dienste zugreifen oder diese nutzen, können wir automatisch Informationen über Sie sammeln, einschließlich:
Nutzungsinformationen:
Wir überwachen die Benutzeraktivitäten in Verbindung mit den Box-Diensten und können folgende Daten sammeln: die von Ihnen genutzten
							Anwendungen und Funktionen, die von Ihnen besuchten Websites, die Größe bzw. Namen der Dateien oder Ordner, die Sie hochladen, herunterladen,
							mit anderen teilen oder auf die Sie bei der Verwendung der Box-Dienste zugreifen, den Inhalt, auf den Sie zugreifen sowie jedwede Aktivitäten in
							Verbindung mit dem Zugriff auf Ihren Inhalt und dessen Verwendung in den Box-Diensten.
Protokollinformationen:
Wir protokollieren Informationen über Sie, wenn Sie auf die Box-Dienste zugreifen und diese verwenden, einschließlich Ihres
							Internetprotokolls („
IP
"), Adresse, Zugriffszeiten, Browser-Typ und -Sprache, ISP, die von Ihnen besuchten Websites, den von
							Ihnen verwendeten Inhalt sowie die URL der von Ihnen besuchten Website, bevor Sie zu den Box-Diensten navigieren.
Geräteinformationen:
Falls Sie über ein mobiles Gerät auf die Box-Dienste zugreifen, erheben wir Daten über das Gerät, einschließlich
							Gerätemodell, Betriebssystem und Version, eindeutige Gerätekennungen, Informationen über das mobile Netzwerk (entsprechend den
							Genehmigungen des mobilen Netzwerks) oder Plattform-Informationen (entsprechend den Genehmigungen des jeweiligen Plattformtyps).
Informationen,
die von Cookies oder sonstigen Tracking-Technologien gesammelt werden:
Wir verwenden verschiedene Tracking-Technologien wie Cookies und Web Beacons (Zählpixel), um Daten zu erheben und Sie von anderen Benutzern
							unserer Website unterscheiden zu können, was auch das Speichern von Cookies auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilem Gerät einschließen kann.
							Dies unterstützt uns, Ihnen eine ausgezeichnete Benutzererfahrung anzubieten, wenn Sie durch unsere Box-Dienste surfen und diese verwenden, und
							ermöglicht uns die Verbesserung der Box-Dienste. Für weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir Cookies und sonstige Tracking-Technologien
							verwenden, lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt
Cookies
.
Informationen, die wir von anderen Quellen erheben
Wir können ebenfalls Daten von Drittparteien erheben und diese mit den Informationen kombinieren, die wir mittels der Box-Dienste gesammelt haben. Zum
						Beispiel können wir Zugriff auf bestimmte Informationen eines Drittanbieters der sozialen Medien haben, falls Sie sich über diesen Drittanbieter
						an Ihrem Online-Konto anmelden oder dieses erstellen oder falls Sie uns anderweitig den Zugriff auf die Daten dieses Drittanbieters gestatten. Jedweder
						Zugriff, den wir von einem Drittanbieter der sozialen Medien auf solche Informationen haben, steht im Einklang mit den Autorisierungsverfahren, die vom
						Anbieter der sozialen Medien festgelegt werden.
Verwendung der Daten
Wir können die von Ihnen gesammelten Daten (zu denen auch persönliche Daten gehören können) für verschiedene Zwecke verwenden,
						einschließlich folgender:
Bereitstellung, Betrieb, Wartung und Verbesserung der Box-Dienste;
· Ihnen zu ermöglichen, auf die Box-Dienste zuzugreifen und sie zu nutzen. Dazu gehört das Hochladen, Herunterladen, die Zusammenarbeit an
						und die Freigabe von Inhalten sowie das Versenden von E-Mails in Ihrem Auftrag;
· Versand von technische Mitteilungen, Aktualisierungen, Sicherheitswarnungen und Nachrichten des Supports bzw. der Verwaltung an Sie;
· Bereitstellung und Lieferung der von Ihnen gewünschten Dienste und Funktionen, Verarbeitung und Abschluss von Transaktionen und
						Übermittlung damit zusammenhängender Informationen an Sie, einschließlich Kaufbestätigungen und Rechnungen;
Beantwortung Ihrer Kommentare, Fragen und Wünsche sowie für den Kunden-Service und Support für Sie;
· Kommunikation mit Ihnen zu Marketingzwecken, vorausgesetzt Sie haben zugestimmt bzw. es ist gesetzlich zulässig. Dazu gehören
						regelmäßige Informationen über Dienste, Funktionen, Umfragen, Newsletter, Angebote, Werbeaktionen, Wettbewerbe und Veranstaltungen sowie
						weitere Neuigkeiten oder Informationen über Box und unsere ausgewählten Partner. Ihre Daten werden an jegliche Drittparteien nur dann zu
						Marketingzwecken und/oder zum Versand von Werbematerial an Sie übermittelt, wenn Sie Ihre Zustimmung geben. Für weitere Informationen
						darüber, wie Sie Ihre Präferenzen ändern können und sich vom Versand von Werbematerial abmelden können (einschließlich
						Newsletter, Werbenachrichten und E-Mail-Benachrichtigungen) lesen Sie bitte den Abschnitt „
Ihre Auswahlmöglichkeiten
"
						unten.
Bearbeitung und Bereitstellung von Wettbewerbs- oder Gewinnspielteilnahmen und Prämien;
Überwachung und Analyse von Trends, Nutzung und Aktivitäten im Zusammenhang mit den Box-Diensten sowie zu Marketing- oder Werbezwecken;
Ermittlung und Prävention betrügerischer Transaktionen, nicht autorisierter Zugriffe auf die Box-Dienste und anderer ungesetzlicher
							Aktivitäten;
Individuelle Anpassung und Verbesserung der Box-Dienste und Bereitstellung von Inhalt, Funktionen und/oder Ihren Interessen entsprechender Werbung oder
							eine anderweitige Anpassung Ihres Benutzererlebnisses mit den Box-Diensten;
Verlinkung oder Kombination mit weiteren Informationen, die wir von Dritten erhalten, damit wir Ihre Bedürfnisse verstehen und Ihnen einen
							besseren Dienst bieten können;
Ihnen die Möglichkeit zu geben, mit den von Ihnen bestimmten Benutzern zu kommunizieren, zusammenzuarbeiten und Dateien freizugeben und
für weitere Zwecke, die wir Ihnen mitteilen.
Wo wir Ihre Daten speichern
Box hat seinen Firmensitz im Vereinigten Königreich, wir können allerdings persönliche Daten und Inhalte in den USA sowie weiteren
						Ländern über unser konzernverbundenes US-Unternehmen Box, Inc. speichern und verarbeiten. Durch den Zugriff oder die Nutzung der Box-Dienste oder
						sonstige Bereitstellung von Informationen an uns stimmen Sie der Informationsverarbeitung und -übermittlung innerhalb und an die USA (wo die Daten in
						unserem Auftrag von Box Inc. und deren Bevollmächtigten) zu, sowie anderen Ländern und Territorien, in denen Datenschutzgesetze gelten
						können, die sich von denen Ihres Wohnsitzstaates unterscheiden.
Box Inc. befolgt die Grundsätze des „Safe Harbor" zum Datenschutz des US-Handelsministeriums (Department of Commerce) bezüglich Erhebung,
						Verwendung und Speicherung personenbezogener Daten, die aus der Europäischen Union stammen, die vom US-Handelsministerium dargelegten „Safe
						Harbor"-Datenschutzgrundsätze der USA und der Schweiz, die die Erhebung, Verwendung und Speicherung von personenbezogenen Daten aus der Schweiz
					regeln. Die Safe-Harbor-Zertifizierungen von Box Inc. können hier eingesehen werden:
http://safeharbor.export.gov/companyinfo.aspx?id=15927
. Für weitere Informationen
					über die Safe-Harbor-Grundsätze besuchen Sie bitte die Website des US-Handelsministeriums unter
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
Falls Sie Fragen zur vorliegenden Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte zuerst an uns unter
support@box.com
.
Weitergabe und Offenlegung von Informationen
Wir werden keine personenbezogenen Daten über Sie oder jedweden Inhalt an Dritte weitergeben, außer wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung
						beschrieben oder im Zusammenhang mit den Box-Diensten. Beispielsweise können wir personenbezogene Daten über Sie wie im Folgenden beschrieben
						weitergeben:
Lieferanten, Berater und andere Dienstanbieter:
Wir können Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, d. h. an Lieferanten, Berater und andere Dienstanbieter, die in unserem Auftrag tätig
							sind und zur Ausübung dieser Tätigkeit Zugriff auf Ihre Informationen benötigen.
Unternehmenskonto:
Falls Sie ein einzelner registrierter Box-Benutzer sind und die Domäne der primären E-Mail-Adresse, die für Ihr Konto bei Box hinterlegt
							wurde, Eigentum Ihres Arbeitgebers ist und Ihnen als Mitarbeiter dieser Organisation zugewiesen wurde und wenn eine solche Organisation ein
							Unternehmenskonto bei Box eröffnen möchte, dann hat der Administrator dieser Organisation möglicherweise Zugriff auf bestimmte Daten -
							zu denen auch Ihre E-Mail-Adresse gehört - bezüglich der bisherigen Nutzung Ihres individuellen Kontos.
Mit Ihrer Zustimmung:
Wir können Ihre Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung weitergeben, u. a. wenn Sie sich entscheiden, die Funktionen zur Zusammenarbeit der Box-Dienste zu
							nutzen, die naturgemäß die Freigabe von Daten an von Ihnen ausgewählte Drittparteien unterstützt. Ihr Name, E-Mail-Adresse,
							Informationen aus Ihrem Profil und Online-Konto (einschließlich Ihres Fotos) und jeder von Ihnen zur Freigabe ausgewählter Inhalt wird an
							solche Drittparteien weitergegeben und diese Drittparteien können durch Ihre Verwendung der Funktionen zur Zusammenarbeit der Box-Dienste mit
							Ihnen kommunizieren (z. B. Kommentare veröffentlichen oder E-Mails an Sie senden). Dritte, die Sie zur Zusammenarbeit als „Editoren"
							eingeladen haben und die die Funktionen der Box-Dienste zur Zusammenarbeit verwenden, können auch durch Sie freigegebenen Inhalt verändern,
							Dokumente und Fotos auf freigegebenen Inhalt hochladen, solchen Inhalt außerhalb der Box-Dienste freigeben sowie andere Drittparteien mit Rechten
							ausstatten, durch die sie den von Ihnen freigegebenen Inhalt ansehen können.
Anwendungen von Drittparteien:
Box gibt Ihnen Möglichkeiten der Verbindung mit Anwendungen oder Diensten von Dritten, z. B. durch unsere Box OneCloud oder unser System von
							Box-Anwendungspartnern. Falls Sie beschließen, solche Anwendungen oder Dienste von Dritten zu nutzen, können wir Daten über Sie
							weitergeben, einschließlich Ihres Benutzernamens und jedweden Inhalts, den Sie in Verbindung mit den genannten Anwendungen und Diensten zur
							Nutzung ausgewählt haben, und diese Drittparteien können Sie ggf. direkt kontaktieren. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
							Ihre Nutzung solcher Anwendungen und Dienste von Dritten und es liegt nicht in unserer Verantwortung, wie diese Drittparteien Ihre Daten und Inhalte
							erheben, verwenden und offenlegen. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, vor der Verbindung mit oder der Nutzung der Anwendungen bzw. Dienste dieser Drittparteien deren
							Datenschutzrichtlinien zu überprüfen, um mehr über deren Informations- und Datenschutzverfahren zu erfahren.
Einhaltung der gesetzlichen Vorschriften:
Wir können Ihre Daten an Dritte weitergeben, falls (a) wir glauben, dass die Offenlegung vernünftigerweise zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze,
							Vorschriften, rechtlicher Verfahren oder behördlicher Anforderungen notwendig ist, (b) um unsere geltenden Vereinbarungen, Richtlinien und
							Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, (c) um die Sicherheit bzw. Integrität der Box-Dienste zu schützen, (d) um Box, unsere Kunden oder die
							Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden oder ungesetzlichen Aktivitäten zu bewahren oder (e) um auf einen Notfall zu reagieren, bei dem wir in gutem
							Glauben davon ausgehen, dass die Offenlegung der Daten zur Verhinderung von Todesfällen oder von schwerwiegenden körperlichen Verletzungen
							einer Person beitragen kann.
Unternehmensübertragungen:
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen an Dritte weitergeben:
o falls wir alle oder einen wesentlichen Teil eines Geschäftsbereichs oder der Vermögenswerte verkaufen, eine Fusion eingehen oder kaufen. Tritt
						dieser Fall ein, dann können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für den künftigen Verkäufer, Fusionspartner oder Käufer dieses
						Geschäftsbetriebes bzw. Anlagevermögens offenlegen oder
o falls Box.com (UK) Limited und/oder unsere weiteren Konzerngesellschaften (einschließlich unseres obersten Mutterunternehmens Box Inc.) oder im
						Wesentlichen all deren Vermögenswerte von einer Drittpartei erworben werden. Tritt dieser Fall ein, werden die personenbezogenen Daten, die das
						Unternehmen über seine Kunden hält, Teil der transferierten Vermögenswerte.
.
Aggregierte oder anonymisierte Daten:
Wir können auch aggregierte oder anonymisierte Informationen an Dritte weitergeben, durch die Sie nicht direkt identifiziert werden können.
Unsere Unternehmensgruppe:
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten jedem Mitglied unserer Unternehmensgruppe offenlegen, d. h. jedem Unternehmen, das Box kontrolliert, von
							Box kontrolliert wird oder unter gemeinsamer Kontrolle mit Box steht.
Funktionen zur Zusammenarbeit und Freigabe
Box-Dienste bieten Funktionen oder weitere integrierte Tools, mit denen Sie Ihren Inhalt über die Box-Dienste freigeben können. Aufgrund des
						kooperativen Charakters der Box-Dienste und auf Basis der von Ihnen definierten Zugriffsrechte und Einstellungen ermöglicht die Verwendung solcher
						Funktionen die Freigabe von Inhalt an andere Personen, mit denen Sie zusammenarbeiten möchten, oder an die Öffentlichkeit. Über Ihr Konto
						können Sie diese Einstellungen jederzeit für eine Datei oder einen Ordner ändern. Für weitere Einzelheiten zur Zusammenarbeit und die
						Freigabe-Funktionen empfehlen wir Ihnen, die Informationen unter
success.box.com
abzurufen.
Sicherheit
Obwohl kein Dienst absolut sicher ist, ergreift Box angemessene Maßnahmen, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten vor Verlust, Diebstahl, Missbrauch und
						unbefugtem Zugriff, Weitergabe, Änderung und Zerstörung zu schützen. Wir verschlüsseln zum Beispiel Ihren Inhalt, wenn er in unseren
						Rechenzentren gespeichert wird. Darüber hinaus ist jede sensible Information wie Kreditkartennummer und Kennwort, die wir von Ihnen über die
						Box-Dienste erbeten, bei der Übertragung im Internet durch Verschlüsselung geschützt, z. B. durch das SSL-Protokoll (Secured Socket Layer).
Die Server, auf denen personenbezogene Daten gespeichert werden, befinden sich in einem kontrollierten Umfeld mit beschränktem Zugang. Obwohl wir
						angemessene Anstrengungen zum Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unternehmen, ist kein Sicherheitssystem unfehlbar. Aufgrund der Eigenheiten des Mediums
						Internet mit seiner offenen, globalen Kommunikationsstruktur können wir nicht garantieren, dass Informationen während der Übertragung im
						Internet bzw. der Speicherung auf unseren Systemen oder auf sonstige Weise in unserer Obhut befindlich, absolut sicher gegen das Eindringen von anderen wie
						beispielsweise Hackern sind. Außerdem können wir nicht garantieren, dass passiv erhobene personenbezogene Daten, die Sie in Dokumente
						miteinbeziehen, die auf unseren Systemen gespeichert sind, sich auf Schutzniveaus befinden, die besonderen Anforderungen oder Verpflichtungen entsprechen,
						die Sie eventuell bezüglich dieser Daten einhalten müssen.
Sie können nur unter Verwendung einer individuellen Benutzer-ID und eines Kennwortes auf Ihre Konto-Informationen und unseren Dienst zugreifen. Zum
						Schutz der Vertraulichkeit der personenbezogenen Daten müssen Sie Ihr Kennwort geheim halten und dürfen es keiner anderen Person offenbaren.
						Bitte teilen Sie uns umgehend mit, falls Sie glauben, dass Ihr Kennwort missbräuchlich benutzt worden ist. Außerdem sollten Sie sich immer
						abmelden und Ihr Browser-Fenster schließen, wenn Sie Ihre Sitzung beenden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir Sie niemals mittels eines unerbetenen
						Telefonanrufs oder einer E-Mail fragen werden, Ihr Kennwort bekanntzugeben.
Cookie-Richtlinie
Wir verwenden verschiedene Tracking-Technologien wie Cookies und Web Beacons, um Daten zu erheben und Sie von anderen Benutzern der Box-Dienste
						unterscheiden zu können, was auch das Speichern von Cookies auf Ihrem Computer oder mobilem Gerät einschließen kann. Dies unterstützt
						uns, Ihnen eine ausgezeichnete Benutzererfahrung anzubieten, wenn Sie durch unsere Box-Dienste surfen und diese verwenden, und ermöglicht uns die
						Verbesserung der Box-Dienste.
Was ist ein Cookie?
Cookies sind kleine Datensätze, die nach Ihrer Zustimmung auf dem Browser oder der Festplatte Ihres Computers gespeichert werden. Cookies enthalten
						Daten, die auf die Festplatte übertragen werden.
Was ist ein Web Beacon?
Ein Web Beacon (auch als „Zählpixel" bekannt) ist ein elektronisches Bild - auch als „gif" bezeichnet, das in den Box-Diensten oder in
						E-Mails benutzt wird. Es hilft uns, Cookies zu übertragen, die Anzahl der Besuche zu erfassen, das Nutzungsverhalten zu verstehen und herauszufinden,
						ob eine E-Mail geöffnet und darauf reagiert worden ist.
Wie verwenden wir diese Technologien?
Wir nutzen Cookies und Web Beacons, um die Box-Dienste und die Benutzererfahrung zu verbessern, Ihr Erlebnis und Ihre Präferenzen anzupassen, Ihnen zu
						ermöglichen, auf die Box-Dienste ohne erneute Eingabe Ihrer Benutzer-ID und/oder des Kennwortes zuzugreifen und diese zu verwenden, um besser zu
						verstehen, welche Bereiche und Funktionen der Box-Dienste am beliebtesten sind und um Besuche zu zählen.
Welche Art von Cookies verwenden wir?
Nachstehend finden Sie eine Übersicht über die Arten von Cookies auf unserer Website und eine Beschreibung über deren Verhalten. Bitte lesen
						Sie hier regelmäßig unsere Informationen, da wir diese von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren:
Funktionelle Cookies
: Funktionelle Cookies sind solche, die Box einsetzt, damit die Website Ihren Erwartungen entsprechend funktioniert. Einige Cookies sind notwendig, damit
						Sie auf unserer Website navigieren und die Dienste nutzen können. Ohne die Hilfe dieser Cookies können wir nicht die von Ihnen gewünschten
						Box-Dienste anbieten, z. B. die Verarbeitung von Bestellungen.
Wir verwenden andere Cookies, damit wir Sie nach der Anmeldung auf der Website erkennen und uns Ihre Einstellungen und Präferenzen merken können
						- beispielsweise Ihre Sprache und Region oder den Anmeldestatus. Diese Cookies helfen uns auch, die von Ihnen angefragten Dienste bereitzustellen. Ihre
						Surf-Aktivitäten auf Websites, die nicht zu Box gehören, werden von diesen Cookies nicht nachverfolgt.
Wie unten beschrieben können Sie jede dieser funktionellen Cookies deaktivieren. Dann könnten jedoch einige der Funktionen der Website für
						Sie nicht zur Verfügung stehen oder nicht so funktionieren, wie sie es sollten.
Performance-Cookies
: Wir verwenden Analyse-Tools von Dritten, um besser zu verstehen, wie unsere Website genutzt wird. Diese Analyse-Tools liefern Box keinerlei
						personenbezogene Daten, die Sie identifizieren. Sie lassen uns u. a. erkennen, wie Sie auf der Box-Website gelandet sind, ob Sie diese zuvor besucht haben,
						wie lange Sie auf der Website bleiben und welche Seiten Sie auf der Website angesehen haben. Sie liefern uns auch allgemeine Informationen über den
						internationalen Standort des Benutzers. Diese Informationen verbessern unsere Erkenntnisse über die Art und Weise, wie Benutzer die Box-Dienste
						verwenden und über die Benutzererfahrung auf unserer Website bzw. mit Box-Diensten - all dies unterstützt uns bei der Optimierung der
						Benutzererfahrung auf Box.
Wie kann ich Cookies verwalten oder ablehnen?
Für weitere Informationen über Cookies und wie man sie deaktiviert, lesen Sie bitte im Abschnitt unten „
Ihre Auswahlmöglichkeiten
" weiter.
Ihre Auswahlmöglichkeiten
Kontoinformationen & Speicherung.
Sie können jederzeit Ihre Informationen aktualisieren, korrigieren oder löschen, indem Sie sich in Ihrem Online-Konto anmelden und diese
						ändern oder uns eine E-Mail schicken an:
support@box.com
. Wir werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten solange wie
						notwendig aufbewahren, um die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecke zu erfüllen. Falls Sie Ihr Konto deaktivieren möchten,
						dann senden Sie uns bitte eine E-Mail an
support@box.com
. Wir weisen Sie jedoch darauf hin, dass wir bestimmte Daten
						laut Gesetz oder für legitime Geschäftszwecke länger speichern können. Ebenso können wir im Cache gespeicherte oder archivierte
						Kopien von Ihren Daten für einen bestimmten Zeitraum aufbewahren.
Kommunikation zu Werbezwecken.
Sie können den Erhalt von Marketingmaterial von Box abbestellen („Opt-out"). Um den Empfang von E-Mails zu Werbezwecken (einschließlich
						Newsletter) von uns zu beenden, folgen Sie den Opt-out-Anweisungen in besagten E-Mails. Sie können auch jederzeit den Erhalt von E-Mails sowie
						anderweitiger Kommunikation von uns zu Werbezwecken abbestellen, indem Sie eine E-Mail an
support@box.com
mit Ihrer
						spezifischen Anfrage senden. Falls Sie Opt-out gewählt haben, können wir Ihnen immer noch Mitteilungen ohne Werbezwecke zukommen lassen, z. B.
						Sicherheitswarnungen und Hinweise bezüglich Zugriff auf oder Nutzung der Box-Dienste oder Hinweise zu Ihrem Online-Konto bzw. zu Ihren laufenden
						Geschäftsbeziehungen.
Cookies/Tracking-Technologien.
Die meisten Webbrowser (wie Internet Explorer, FireFox und Safari) sind in den Standardeinstellungen so konfiguriert, dass sie Cookies automatisch
						akzeptieren. Falls Sie Cookies oder andere Tracking-Technologien ablehnen, können Sie normalerweise Ihren Browser so einstellen, dass Browser-Cookies
						entfernt oder abgelehnt werden oder Sie per Eingabeaufforderung gefragt werden, bevor Cookies akzeptiert werden. Sie können auch bereits gesetzte
					Cookies löschen. Die Hilfe-Funktion im Browser sollte dies näher erläutern. Alternativ können Sie
www.aboutcookies.org
besuchen, wo umfangreiche Informationen über diesen Vorgang für eine ganze
						Bandbreite von Desktop-Browsern zur Verfügung stehen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Entfernung oder Ablehnung von Browser-Cookies die
						Verfügbarkeit oder Funktionalität der Box-Dienste beeinträchtigen kann.
Ihre Rechte
Sie haben die folgenden Rechte:
· das Recht, jederzeit von uns Kopien Ihrer bei uns abgespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten anzufordern, vorbehaltlich einer gesetzlich bestimmten
						Gebühr;
· das Recht, gebührenfrei von uns eine Aktualisierung und Korrektur jedweder überholter Daten oder falscher personenbezogener Informationen,
						die bei uns über Sie abgespeichert sind, anzufordern und
das Recht, jedweder Kommunikation zu Marketingzwecken zu widersprechen, die wir (oder eine Drittpartei, an die wir mit Ihrer Zustimmung Ihre
					personenbezogenen Daten weitergegeben haben) an Sie schicken könnten. Bitte lesen Sie den Abschnitt „
Ihre Auswahlmöglichkeiten
" oben für nähere Informationen.
Links auf Websites von Dritten
Wir können auf den Box-Diensten Links platzieren. Wenn Sie von unserer Website aus auf einen Link zur Website einer Drittpartei klicken, gelten
						für Ihre Aktivitäten und die Nutzung der verlinkten Website die Richtlinien dieser Website und nicht diejenigen von Box. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, die
						entsprechenden Websites zu besuchen und deren Datenschutz- und Nutzungsrichtlinien zu überprüfen.
Unsere Richtlinie zum Kinder- und Jugendschutz
Box-Dienste richten sich nicht an Personen unter 13 Jahren. Wir erfassen nicht wissentlich personenbezogene Daten von Kindern unter 13 Jahren. Falls Ihnen
					bekannt wird, dass ein Kind uns personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat, nehmen Sie bitte Kontakt mit uns auf:
support@box.com
. Falls wir Kenntnis davon erhalten, dass ein Kind unter 13 Jahren uns personenbezogene Daten zur
						Verfügung gestellt hat, werden wir Maßnahmen ergreifen, um solche Daten zu löschen.
Kontaktieren Sie uns
Wenn Sie Fragen, Anmerkungen oder Anliegen im Hinblick auf diese Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte an
support@box.com
.
►
All other countries - English
Box.com (UK) Ltd ("
Box", "we", "us" or "our")
respect the privacy rights of users and recognise the importance of protecting and handling
						information collected about you in accordance with both the law and best practice.
This Online and Mobile Privacy and Cookie Policy, together with our
Terms of Service
and any other
						documents referred to below ("
Privacy Policy
") tells you ("
you
" or "
your
") how your information
						(including personal data and/or sensitive personal data) is collected, used, stored and disclosed by Box as well as specific choices you can make about
						your information.
This Privacy Policy applies to information we collect when you use or access our online or mobile websites available at www.Box.com ("
Site
"), products, services or applications (collectively, the "
Box Services
"), or when you otherwise interact with us.
Please read
the
following carefully to understand our views
and
practices regarding your personal data and how we will treat it.
For the purpose of the Data Protection Act 1998 ("
the Act
"), the data controller is Box.com (UK) Limited of 64 North Row, 2nd floor, London W1K 7LL, United Kingdom.
Please be aware that Box is not always the data controller for all aspects of the services. Some personal data uploaded or processed as a part of the Box
						Services will be uploaded by the ultimate data controller. For example, by employees or agents acting on its behalf. This may include personal data
						contained in files, documents or images shared or collaborated on using the Box Service. In such circumstances Box is the data processor acting on behalf
					of the ultimate data controller and the Box Services are deployed on behalf of the data controller (like your employer or a university (a "
Business User
")). That data controller has a separate enterprise agreement with us under which we act on its behalf using organizational
						and technical methods to secure and protect the personal data for which it is responsible.
Therefore, if you are Business User the terms of that organisation's contract for the Box Services may restrict our collection or use of your information
						more than what is described in this Privacy Policy. Please therefore read those terms in conjunction with this Privacy Policy.
In this Privacy Policy the terms personal data and sensitive personal data shall have the same meanings as is given to them in the Act.
Changes to This Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we make any changes, we will notify you by revising the "Last Updated" date at the top of this
						Privacy Policy and, in some cases, where appropriate we may provide you with additional notice (such as adding a statement to our homepage or sending you
						an email notification). If there are material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you more directly by email. We therefore encourage you to
						review our Privacy Policy whenever you access the Box Services to stay informed about our information practices and the ways you can help protect your
						privacy.
If you disagree with any changes to this Privacy Policy and do not wish your information to be subject to the revised Privacy Policy, you will need to
							deactivate with us and stop using the Box Services.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or the information that we hold about you, please contact us as provided in the
Contacting Us
section
						below.
Information Collected.
We collect a variety of information to enable us to provide the Box Service, improve our Site and enhance our users' experience of our services, for
						example, by determining the location of your Internet Service Provider ("
ISP
") we are able to serve a localised skew of our Site (for
						example enabling contact, language and currency modifications). For more information about the purposes for which we use your information please see the
Use of Information
section below.
We collect the following information (which may include personal data and/or sensitive personal data):
Information You Provide To Us.
We collect information you provide directly to us when you use the Site and when you register for and use the Box Services. Examples include:
· We collect information when you register with Box for an account, create or modify your profile and online account, access and use the Box Services
						(including but not limited to when you upload, download, collaborate on or share files or other information), participate in any interactive features of
						the Box Services, participate in a survey, contest, promotion, sweepstakes, activity or event, make a purchase, apply for a job, request customer support,
						communicate with us via third-party social media sites or otherwise communicate with us.
· The types of information we may collect directly from you include your name, username, email address, postal address, phone number, information
						about your data storage preferences, employer's name, job title, transactional information (including services purchased or subscribed to and billing
						address) as well as any contact or other information you choose to provide. We also store the files or other information that you upload or provide to the
						Box Services ("
Content
").
· If you are providing information (including personal data) about someone else you confirm that they have appointed you to act for them and consent
						to the processing of their personal and that you have informed them of our identity and the purposes (as set out in this Privacy Policy) for which their
						personal data will be processed.
Information We Collect Automatically
When you access or use the Box Services, we may automatically collect information about you, including:
Usage Information:
We monitor user activity in connection with the Box Services and may collect information about the applications and features you use, the websites you
							visit, the sizes and names of the files or folders you upload, download, share or access while using the Box Services, the Content you access and any
							actions taken in connection with the access and use of your Content in the Box Services.
Log Information:
We log information about you when you access and use the Box Services including your Internet Protocol ("
IP
") address, access times,
							browser type and language, ISP, the Web pages that you visit, the Content you use and the URL of the Web page you visited before navigating to the Box
							Services.
Device Information:
If you access the Box Services from a mobile device, we collect information about the device, including the hardware model, operating system and
							version, unique device identifiers, mobile network information (as allowed by the mobile network) or platform information (as allowed by the specific
							platform type).
Information
Collected by Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies:
We use various tracking technologies such as cookies and web beacons to collect information and distinguish you from other users of our Site, which may
							include saving cookies to your computer or mobile device. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you browse and use our Box Services
					and also allows us to improve our Box Services. For more information about how we use cookies and other tracking technologies please see the
Cookies
section.
Information We Collect From Other Sources.
We may also obtain information from third parties and combine that with information we collect through the Box Services. For example, we may have access to
						certain information from a third-party social media service if you create or log into your online account through the service or otherwise provide us with
						access to information from the service. Any access that we may have to such information from a third-party social media service is in accordance with the
						authorisation procedures determined by the social media service.
Use of Information.
We may use the information (which may include personal data) we collect about you for a variety of purposes, including to:
Provide, operate, maintain and improve the Box Services;
· Enable you to access and use the Box Services, including uploading, downloading, collaborating on and sharing Content and sending emails on your
						behalf;
· Send you technical notices, updates, security alerts and support and administrative messages;
· Provide and deliver the services and features you request, process and complete transactions, and send you related information, including purchase
						confirmations and invoices;
Respond to your comments, questions, and requests and provide customer service and support;
· Communicate with you, where you have agreed or where the law permits, for marketing purposes, including to periodically inform you about services,
						features, surveys, newsletters, offers, promotions, contests and events, and provide other news or information about Box and our select partners; We will
						only share your personal data with anyone else for marketing purposes and/or send you promotional materials if you consent. For more information about how
						to change your preferences, and to unsubscribe from promotional materials (including newsletters, marketing messages and email notifications) please see
						the
Your Choices
section below.
Process and deliver contest or sweepstakes entries and rewards;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Box Services and for marketing or advertising purposes;
Investigate and prevent fraudulent transactions, unauthorised access to the Box Services, and other illegal activities;
Personalise and improve the Box Services, and provide content, features, and/or advertisements that match your interests and preferences or otherwise
							customise your experience on the Box Services;
Link or combine with other information we receive from third parties to help understand your needs and provide you with better service;
Enable you to communicate, collaborate, and share files with users you designate; and
For other purposes about which we notify you.
Where we store your information
Box is based in the United Kingdom, but we may store and process personal information and content in the United States and other countries through our
						affiliated US group company Box, Inc.. By accessing or using the Box Services or otherwise providing information to us, you consent to the processing and
						transfer of information in and to the U.S. (where it is stored on our behalf by Box Inc. and its agents) and other countries and territories, which may
						have different privacy laws from your country of residence.
Box Inc. adheres to the U.S. Department of Commerce's Safe Harbor privacy principles regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information
						from the European Union, and the U.S. Department of Commerce's U.S. Swiss Safe Harbor privacy principles regarding the collection, use, and retention of
					personal information from Switzerland. Box Inc.'s Safe Harbor certifications can be reviewed at:
http://safeharbor.export.gov/companyinfo.aspx?id=15927
. For more information about the
						Safe Harbor Principles, please visit the U.S. Department of Commerce's Website at
http://export.gov/safeharbor/
.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you should first contact us at
support@box.com
.
Sharing and Disclosure of Information.
We will not share personal information about you or any Content with any third parties except as described in this Privacy Policy or in connection with the
						Box Services. For example, we may share personal information about you including as follows:
Vendors, Consultants and Other Service Providers:
We may share your information with third-party vendors, consultants and other service providers who are working on our behalf and require access to
							your information to carry out that work.
Corporate Account:
If you are an individual Box registered user and the domain of the primary email address associated with your Box account is owned by your employer and
							was assigned to you as an employee of that organization, and such organization wishes to establish a Box corporate account, then certain information
							concerning past use of your individual account may become accessible to that organization's administrator including your email address.
With Your Consent:
We may share your information with your consent, including when you choose to use collaboration features in the Box Services that by their nature
							support sharing with third parties who you choose. Your name, email address, information from your profile and online account (including your photo),
							and any Content you choose to share will be shared with such third parties, and such third parties may communicate with you (such as by posting
							comments or emailing you) in connection with your use of the collaboration features of the Box Services. For example, third parties who you invite to
							collaborate with you as "Editors" using the collaboration features of the Box Services may also modify Content that you have shared, upload documents
							and photos to Content you have shared, share such Content outside of the Box Services, and provide other third parties with rights to view the Content
							you have shared.
Third Party Applications:
Box provides you with opportunities to connect with third-party applications or services, such as through our Box OneCloud or Box application partner
							ecosystem. If you choose to use any such third-party applications or services, we may share information about you including your username and any
							Content you choose to use in connection with those applications and services, and such third parties may contact you directly as necessary. This
							Privacy Policy does not apply to your use of such third-party applications and services, and we are not responsible for how those third parties
							collect, use and disclose your information and Content. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of those third parties before connecting to or
							using their applications or services to learn more about their information and privacy practices.
Compliance with Laws:
We may disclose your information to a third party if (a) we believe that disclosure is reasonably necessary to comply with any applicable law,
							regulation, legal process or governmental request, (b) to enforce our agreements, policies and Terms of Service, (c) to protect the security or
							integrity of the Box Services, (d) to protect Box, our customers or the public from harm or illegal activities, or (e) to respond to an emergency which
							we believe in the good faith requires us to disclose information to assist in preventing the death or serious bodily injury of any person.
Business Transfers:
We may disclose your personal information to third parties:
o In the event that we sell, merge with or buy all or a substantial portion of any business or assets, in which case we may disclose your personal data to
						the prospective seller, merger partner or buyer of such business or assets; or
o If Box.com (UK) Limited and/or our other group companies (including our ultimate parent Box Inc.) or substantially all of their assets are acquired by a
						third party, in which case personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the transferred assets.
.
Aggregated or Anonymised Data:
We may also share aggregated or anonymised information with third parties that does not directly identify you.
Our Group:
We may disclose your personal information to any member of our group, which means any company which controls, is controlled by or is under common
							control with Box.
Collaboration and Sharing Features.
The Box Services offers collaboration features or other integrated tools, which allow you to share your Content through the Box Services. As a function of
						the collaborative nature of the Box Services and based on the permissions and settings you choose, the use of such features enables the sharing of Content
						with people you want to collaborate with or with the public. You can choose to change your settings at any time for a file or folder through your account.
					For more information about such collaboration and sharing features, we encourage you to review the information provided on
success.box.com
.
Security.
While no service is completely secure, Box takes reasonable measures to help protect information about you from loss, theft, misuse and unauthorised
						access, disclosure, alteration and destruction. For example, we encrypt your Content when it is stored in our data centers. In addition, sensitive
						information such as credit card number and password that we request from you on the Box Services is protected with encryption, such as Secured Socket Layer
						(SSL) protocol, during transmission over the Internet.
The servers on which personal information is stored are kept in a controlled environment with limited access. While we take reasonable efforts to guard
						personal information we knowingly collect directly from you, no security system is impenetrable and due to the inherent nature of the Internet as an open
						global communications vehicle, we cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet or while stored on our systems or otherwise
						in our care, will be absolutely safe from intrusion by others, such as hackers. In addition, we cannot guarantee that any passively-collected personal
						information you choose to include in documents you store on our systems are maintained at levels of protection to meet specific needs or obligations you
						may have relating to that information.
You may access your account information and our service only through the use of an individual user ID and password. To protect the confidentiality of
						personal information, you must keep your password confidential and not disclose it to any other person. Please advise us immediately if you believe your
						password has been misused. In addition, always logout and close your browser when you finish your session. Please note that we will never ask you to
						disclose your password in an unsolicited phone call or email.
Cookie Policy.
We use various tracking technologies such as cookies and web beacons to collect information and distinguish you from other users of the Box Services, which
						may include saving cookies to your computer or mobile device. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you browse and use our Box Services
						and also allows us to improve our Box Services.
What is a cookie?
Cookies are small data files stored on your browser or hard drive of your computer if you agree. Cookies contain information that is transferred to your
						hard drive.
What is a web beacon?
A web beacon (also known as "tracking pixels") is an electronic image, also called a "gif," that may be used in the Box Services or in emails that help us
						to deliver cookies, count visits, understand usage and campaign effectiveness and determine whether an email has been opened and acted upon.
How do we use these technologies?
We use cookies and web beacons to help us to improve the Box Services and your experience, customise your experience and preferences, allow you to access
						and use the Box Services without re-entering your member ID and/or password, understand which areas and features of the Box Services are most popular and
						count visits.
What cookies do we use?
Below we have provided an overview of the categories of cookies found on our Site, and a description of what those cookies do. Please check back here
						periodically as we may update this information from time to time:
Functional Cookies
: Functional cookies are ones that Box sets to help the Site work the way you expect it. Some cookies are necessary to enable you to move around our Site
						and to use the Services. Without these cookies, we can't provide the Box Services you have asked for, like processing your orders.
We use other cookies to help recognise and remember you when you are logged into the Site so we can remember your settings and preferences, such as your
						language and region or logged in state. These cookies also may help us provide services you have asked for. These cookies do not track your browsing
						activity on non-Box websites.
As described below, you may disable any of these functional cookies; but if you do so, then various functions of the Site may be unavailable to you or may
						not work the way you want them to.
Performance Cookies
: We use third party analytics tools to help us understand how you use our Site. Such analytics tools not provide Box with any personal data that
						identifies you. They tell us things like how you arrived at the Box Site, if you have visited before, how long you stay on the Site, and which pages on the
						Site you visited. They can also provide us with general information about where in the world a user may be located. This information helps us understand
						how people use the Box Services and gives us information about the kind of experience people have on our Site and through the Box Services, all of which
						helps us to make the Box experience even better.
How do I manage or refuse cookies?
For more information about cookies and how to disable them, please see the
"Your Choices"
section below.
Your Choices.
Account Information & Retention.
You may update, correct or delete information about you at any time by logging into your online account and modifying your information or by emailing us at
support@box.com
. We will retain your personal information for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in
						this Privacy Policy. If you wish to deactivate your account, please email us at
support@box.com
, but note that we may
						retain certain information as required by law or for legitimate business purposes. We may also retain cached or archived copies of information about you
						for a certain period of time.
Promotional Communications.
You can "opt out" of receiving marketing communications from Box. To stop receiving promotional emails (including newsletters) form us follow the opt-out
						instructions provided in those emails. You may also opt-out of receiving promotional emails and other promotional communications from us at any time by
						emailing
support@box.com
with your specific request. If you opt out, we may still send you non-promotional
						communications, such as security alerts and notices related to your access to or use of the Box Services or those about your online account or our ongoing
						business relations.
Cookies/tracking technologies.
Most web browsers (such as Internet Explorer, FireFox and Safari) are set to automatically accept cookies as the default setting. If you don't want to
						receive cookies or other tracking technologies, you can usually choose to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies or to prompt you before
						accepting such a cookie. You can also delete cookies that have already been set. The "Help" function within your browser should tell you how. Alternatively
						you may wish to visit
www.aboutcookies.org
, which contains comprehensive information on how to do this on a wide
						variety of desktop browsers. Please note that, if you choose to remove or reject browser cookies, this could affect the availability or functionality of
						the Box Services.
Your rights.
You have the following rights:
· the right to ask us to provide you with copies of personal information that we hold about you at any time, subject to a fee specified by law;
· the right to ask us to update and correct any out-of-date or incorrect personal information that we hold about you free of charge; and
the right to opt out of any marketing communications that we (or any third party to whom we have disclosed your personal information with your consent) may
						send you. Please see the
"Your Choices"
above for more information.
Links to Third Party Websites.
We may place links on the Box Services. When you click on a link to a third party website from our website, your activity and use on the linked website is
						governed by that website's policies, not by those of Box. We encourage you to visit their websites and review their privacy and user policies.
Our Policy Toward Children.
The Box Services is not directed to individuals under 13. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13. If you become aware that
						a child has provided us with personal information, please contact us at
support@box.com
. If we become aware that a
						child under 13 has provided us with personal information, we will take steps to delete such information.
Contacting Us.
Any questions, comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy should be addressed to
support@box.com
.